Four more years.   #AmericaForward high-five count: two.   Worth a RT: Obama's national security record - ending the Iraq war, decimating al Qaeda, restoring our standing abroad.  
We're all in this together. That's how we campaigned, and that's who we are. Thank you. -bo  An #AmericaForward tour update, straight from the source:   FACT: In 2008, Barack Obama said he would end the war in Iraq, and he kept his promise.  
This happened because of you. Thank you.  16,000 strong in Denver:   FACT: Unlike President Obama, Romney has no plan to end the war in Afghanistan and bring our troops home. 
Nevada, pass it on: Polls close at 7pm PT. You can vote as long as you're in line before then. #StayInLine  (Adorable) Coloradans for Obama:   FACT: Romney said it was “tragic” to bring troops home from Iraq. 
Last chance to help win this election: Pick up your phone and call voters in key states.  #StayInLine  Good thing #Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions:   Mitt Romney failed in his audition on the world stage:  
Iowa, spread the word: Your polls close at 9pm CT, and you can vote as long as you're in line by then. #StayInLine  “If you give me your vote, Colorado, you’ll have a President who hears your voice—who fights for your families.” #AmericaForward  Tomorrow is the voter registration deadline in many states around the country. Register here in less than 5 minutes:  
Reminder: If you're waiting to vote in Florida, #StayInLine! As long as you were in line when polls closed, you can still vote.  The turnout in Denver:   A former Republican senator and Vietnam veteran endorses President Obama for a second term as commander-in-chief:  
Step 1: Pick up your phone. Step 2: Call voters in key states. Step 3: Help win this election.    "No matter who you are, no matter what you look like, no matter where you come from, here in America, you can make it if you try."  “Reckless.” “Amateurish.” Just some of the reviews of Mitt Romney’s debut on the world stage:  
Wisconsin & Minnesota: Polls close at 8pm CT. Spread the word: You can vote as long as you're in line before then. #StayInLine  Obama: “It’s up to the not-so-young people—including me—to choose what we leave behind for future generations.” #AmericaForward  "I knew, right then and there, that we were all in this together. I knew that I needed to help out with this campaign."  
New Mexico & Colorado, RT this: Polls close at 7pm MT, and you can vote as long as you're in line by then. #StayInLine  Obama: “It’s up to the not-so-young people—including me—to choose what we leave behind for future generations.” #AmericaForward  If you agree we’re all in this together, share the President’s plan to keep us moving forward:   
Help get out the vote: Grab your phone and call voters right now.    Obama: "I’ll never turn Medicare into a voucher. No American should spend their golden years at the mercy of insurance companies."  See how President Obama's policies are helping your community:   
Let your friends know you had the President's back today:   President Obama: “My plan will actually cut the deficit, unlike Gov. Romney’s.” #AmericaForward  Just 29 days left to win this thing. Take less than 5 minutes to register to vote—then share this link:  
President Obama recorded an Election Day message for you:  #ElectionDay2012  “I want to reward small businesses and manufacturers that are creating jobs right here in the United States.” #AmericaForward  Eight years after the Obamas paid off their own student loans, they’re working to make education more affordable:  
Pennsylvania: Polls close at 8pm ET, and you can vote as long as you're in line before then. Spread the word.  President Obama: “Unlike Mitt Romney, I’m actually proud to talk about my plan. Because the numbers add up.” #AmericaForward  Photo of the day:  
Ohio and North Carolina: Polls close at 7:30pm ET, and you can vote as long as you're in line before then. Go vote now, and spread the word!  Obama: “Trust matters. One thing I think you've seen over the past 4 years is that I mean what I say. I do what I say I’m going to do.”  President Obama: "Governor Romney was fact-checked by his own campaign. That's rough."  
If you’re in line when the polls close, stay in line to vote. It could help make the difference.   President Obama: “He’s hoping you won’t remember that he wants to give millionaires and billionaires a $250,000 tax cut." #Romnesia  Mitt Romney has been keeping the fact-checkers busy since last week's debate:  
Don't watch this video:    On Romney: "He's hoping you don't remember that his economic plan is more likely to create jobs in China than here in the United States."  “We’ve made too much progress to return to the policies that got us into this mess in the first place.”  
Just a handful of votes could decide this election. Confirm your polling place and go vote now:  #ElectionDay2012  “I can’t tell you who I’m voting for—it’s a secret ballot. But Michelle said she voted for me.”—President Obama  Join & on #TeamObama and make sure you're registered and ready to vote:  
This guy's counting on you:    President Obama: "Hello Colorado! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?" #AmericaForward  Just 30 days left in this campaign. If you're on #TeamObama, sign up to help win this thing:  
Already voted? Get on the phone and help turn out voters in key states where a few votes could make the difference:   Watch live: President Obama speaks in Colorado at the second stop on his 48-hour tour.  #AmericaForward  Add your name if you agree with the President that our economy grows best from the middle out, not the top down:  
Will Ferrell will do anything to get you and your friends to vote right now:  #VoteObama  Wheels down Denver.   If you've moved recently, remember to register to vote at your current address. It takes less than 5 minutes:  
Ohio: This election could come down to just a few votes, and yours could make the difference.    Excellent signage spotted in Denver, CO:   Volunteers across the country are making a difference at phone banks right now. Find one near you:  
Jay Z wants you in a voting state of mind today.   #VoteObama  Denver, representing:   Pitch in $5 to support the only candidate in this race who has a plan to keep us moving forward, not back:  
This election is close, and your vote could make the difference. Confirm where to cast your ballot now:   Nick, age 9, saw the President the last time he was in Denver. He made this sign all by himself.   A few Women for Obama in Fairfax, VA.  
Spread the word: You can still make the difference in this election. Help get out the vote now:    Already lining up in the Mile-High City to see President Obama:   There’s exactly one month until all of the votes are counted. What you do in the next 31 days makes a difference:  
If he can find the time to make calls today, so can you!    Bye, Iowa. Next stop: Denver.   A new tool you’ll want to share with family and friends:  
Today, always be doing something:    "Love you guys!"   Election Day is one month away, but voter registration deadlines in most states are this week. Register now:  #RegToVote 
Just a few votes could make the difference in this election—grab a friend when you vote today.   Everybody say cheese:   More on what it means that 1,825,813 people raised $181 million for the campaign and combined committees in September:  
We're coming to the end of a long campaign—all that's left to do is get out the vote. Let's win this. -bo  The folks I just met over pizza in Iowa are exactly why I love coming to this state. Thanks for always making me feel at home. -bo  Let's keep it going. Be the 4 millionth person to own a piece of this campaign:  
Share why you're voting for President Obama today with the hashtag #VoteObama.  The President talks ground game with neighborhood team leaders in Davenport, Iowa:   Since this campaign launched in April 2011, a total of 3,922,420 people have pitched in to make it what it is. 
Carol from NH is voting for Obama-Biden because “My taxes have gone down, and my take-home pay has gone up.” #VoteObama  Walking out to greet the crowd in Iowa—from the President's point of view:   If you gave $5, it helped. 98% of September's contributions were $250 or less, with an average contribution of $53. 
“I trust President Obama. I do not trust Mitt Romney. And that's really all I need to know.”—Joe, a Purple Heart veteran from PA #VoteObama  America Forward tour high-five count: 1 (so far).   Of the 1,825,813 people who donated in September, 567,000 were new to this organization—not having given before in 2008 or 2012. 
“It's been years since I've felt connected at any level to a president.”—Gabe, OH, who voted McCain in ’08 but is voting Obama-Biden in 2012  Obama: "If you give me your vote … you will have a President who hears your voices, who fights for your families."   Some amazing news this morning: 1,825,813 people came together to raise $181 million for this campaign in September.  
“I am a military wife with 6 children, and the added Pell Grant benefit has afforded our family to allow me to go back to school.”—Amy, FL  Making friends in Iowa.   Educators for Obama out in full force.  
Amanda, AK: “I am supporting President Obama as both a college student and a veteran because he has never given up on fighting for us.”  A look back at the crowd in Davenport:   “Today, I believe that as a nation, we are moving forward again.”  
Check out a few voters’ reasons for supporting President Obama—then grab a friend and go #VoteObama:   The crowd in Davenport: Four more years.  #Forward2012  Mitt Romney isn't telling the truth:  
Time to vote! Grab a friend to join you and head over to your polling place:    President Obama: "My math actually adds up. Check it out at   Voter registration deadlines are coming up fast. Make sure your friends don’t sit out this election:  
25 reasons that 25 people are voting for President Obama:   "I've got a plan that will actually create jobs, that will actually reduce the deficit, that will actually increase middle-class security."  Mitt Romney owes Americans the truth. It’s that simple.  
At the final rally of his final campaign last night, President Obama told the story of "Fired up! Ready to go!"   A word backstage from President Obama to kick off the America Forward tour:   Backstage with the President in Fairfax, Virginia.  
It’s Election Day! This is your last chance to help win this thing—RT this link so your friends know where to vote:   President Obama: "We've come too far to turn back now. We can’t afford to go back to the same policies that got us into this mess."  Read & share President Obama's long-term economic plan to grow the economy and create jobs:  
Election Day is here! Confirm your polling place and bring a friend with you to vote.    President Obama: "The unemployment rate has fallen to its lowest level since I took office. Home values & home sales are rising." #progress  The unemployment rate is below 8% for the first time since January 2009. 
President Obama tells the story of "Fired up! Ready to go!" at the final rally of his final campaign.  #Forward  "I bet on American workers and American ingenuity, and we saved a dying auto industry that's back on top of the world."—President Obama  Good news today: The economy has added 5.2 million private sector jobs over 31 straight months.  
Let's give this guy four more years.   President Obama: "I promised to end taxpayer-funded Wall Street bailouts for good—and we did." #PromiseKept  President Obama: “If we rally around a new economic patriotism together—if we reclaim our values—we will rebuild this economy.” 
“Let’s go vote. Let’s keep moving forward.” —President Obama  President Obama: "I promised to cut taxes for middle-class families and small businesses—and we have." #PromiseKept  President Obama: “For all you moms and kids out there, don’t worry—someone is finally getting tough on Big Bird. Elmo, too.” 
“Iowa, tomorrow let’s remind the world just why the United States of America is the greatest nation on Earth.” —President Obama  The crowd at the President's first stop in Davenport, Iowa:   POTUS: “Gov. Romney plans to let Wall Street run wild again, but he’s bringing the hammer down on Sesame Street.” 
Obama: “One voice can change a room. And if it can change a room, it can change a city. And if it can change a city, it can change a state.”  President Obama: "I told you we’d end the war in Iraq. We did. I said we’d end the war in Afghanistan. We are." #PromiseKept  President Obama on Romney: “The bottom line is, his underlying philosophy is the top-down economics that we've seen before.” 
Edith is in North Carolina this week, getting out the vote. “I’m still fired up but I’ve got work to do,” she said.  "I haven’t finished all the work we set out to do in 2008 just yet, but I have fought for you every single day that I've held this office."  “It’s a reminder that this country has come too far to turn back now.”—President Obama on today’s positive jobs numbers 
"The woman, her name was Edith Childs, she became a celebrity. She was written up in the Wall Street Journal."  "This is where it all began 4 years ago. On your front porches, in your backyards: This is where the movement for change began."  “Today’s news is not an excuse to talk down the economy to score a few political points.”—President Obama in Virginia 
“But after a few minutes, I’m feeling kind of fired up. I’m feeling kind of ready to go.”  Homemade t-shirts and extra-big smiles for President Obama in Iowa:   President Obama: “More Americans entered the workforce, more Americans are getting jobs.” 
“So I turn and look behind me, and there’s this small woman, 60 years old. She’s famous for her chant. She does it wherever she goes.”  President Obama in Iowa: "It's good to be back. Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?"  President Obama: “This morning, we found out that the unemployment rate has fallen to its lowest level since I took office.” 
“And when the voice says ‘Fired up!’ They all say ‘Ready to go!’"  We'll be live-tweeting the President's remarks on along for the latest.  “After losing about 800,000 jobs a month when I took office, our businesses have now added 5.2 million new jobs over the past 2.5 years.” 
And as I make my way around the room, suddenly I hear this voice cry out behind me: “Fired up!”  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about what's at stake in this election.   “Today, I believe that as a nation, we are moving forward again.”—President Obama in Fairfax, VA 
“We get to Greenwood, and we pull up to a small field house. I walk in and there are about 20 people there.”  President Obama is setting off this morning on an 8-state, 48-hour trip. Follow along:    Watch live: President Obama speaks in Fairfax, Virginia.  
"I got a powerful reminder of this myself on our last campaign."  13 days ‘til Election Day, but people in many states are already voting. Find out when voting starts in your state:   32 days left in this campaign, and some states are already voting. Register to vote now—then pass this link on:  
"Don’t ever believe your vote doesn’t matter. Don’t ever let anyone tell you your voice can’t make a difference." —President Obama  Photo of the day:   30,000 supporters turned out to see President Obama in Madison today.  #Forward2012 
"It's out of my hands now. It's in yours. All of it depends on what you do when you step into that voting booth tomorrow."  “I’m gonna need you fired up. I’m gonna need you ready to go.” The President, First Lady & VP on the road to Nov. 6th:   Take a few minutes and make sure you’re registered to vote—then RT this link so your friends can, too:  #RegToVote 
“Here in America, you can make it if you try. That’s what we’re fighting for.” —President Obama  Hello, Florida:   The President's plan would keep us moving forward. Romney would return to the failed policies that crashed the economy:  
"Now is the time to keep pushing forward." —President Obama  “I bet on American workers. I bet on American manufacturing.” President Obama on the choice we face in this election:   FACT: Romney claims we need “great teachers,” but his budget plan could lead to teacher layoffs:  
"We have come too far to turn back now. We have come too far to let our hearts grow faint." —President Obama  Make sure your friends see the President’s second-term plans to keep us moving forward:    FACT: Last night, Romney confirmed that he opposes asking the very wealthy for a single dollar in new revenue to reduce the deficit. 
“Iowa, I’m not ready to give up the fight. I’ve got a lot more fight left in me.”  FACT: Obama would use half the savings from ending the war in Afghanistan to pay down the debt, and invest the rest in rebuilding America.  FACT: Romney's plan repeals Obamacare, won't protect families from insurance company abuses, and leaves 50 million more Americans uninsured. 
"If you want to break the gridlock in Congress, you’ll vote for leaders who feel the same way."  FACT: Obama’s plan to reduce the deficit by more than $4 trillion asks the wealthy to pay a little more and cuts spending we don’t need.  FACT: Romney would raise taxes on middle-class families or explode the deficit to pay for his $5 trillion tax cut skewed to the wealthy. 
"I will work with anybody, of any party, to move this country forward." —President Obama  FACT: The President’s plan will help recruit 100,000 math and science teachers and train 2 million Americans at our community colleges.  President Obama on Romney’s false debate claims: “If you want to be President, you owe the American people the truth.”  
"I ran because your voices had been shut out of our democracy for way too long." —President Obama  FACT: The President’s all-of-the-above energy strategy will help cut our oil imports in half & double the fuel efficiency of cars & trucks.  Missing from Mitt Romney’s debate performance last night: Facts.  
"We’re not going to turn Medicare into a voucher just to pay for another millionaire’s tax cut." —President Obama  FACT: President Obama’s plan will help create 1 million new manufacturing jobs and double our exports. #MadeInAmerica  Bundled-up Coloradans for Obama:  
"Change is turning the page on a decade of war so we can do some nation-building here at home." —President Obama  President Obama has a concrete second-term plan to create jobs and strengthen the middle class:   Important: If you’re not registered to vote at your current address, take care of it now:  #RegToVote 
"Change comes when we live up to this country’s legacy of innovation, by investing in the next generation of technology and manufacturing."  President Obama: "I believe in you, and I need you to keep believing in me."  #GottaVote  President Obama: "I still believe in you, and I’m asking you to keep believing in me. I’m asking for your vote." #ForwardNotBack 
"Change is a country where every American has a shot at a good education." —President Obama  Obama on Romney's failure to mention veterans last night: "They deserve better from somebody who wants to be commander in chief."  President Obama: "We understand that America is not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us, together." 
“After all we’ve fought through together, we cannot give up on change now.” —President Obama  “We can’t go back to what got us into this mess. We need to move forward with what’s getting us out of this mess.”—President Obama  President Obama: "I’ll use the money we’re no longer spending on war to pay down our debt and put more people back to work." 
"You know I tell the truth. You know that I’ll fight for you and your families every single day, as hard as I know how." —President Obama  President Obama: “The people of Ohio don’t forget. If Mitt Romney had been president … we might not have an American auto industry.”  “Four years ago, I promised to end the war in Iraq. We did. I said we’d wind down the war in Afghanistan in a responsible way. We are.” 
"You may not agree with every decision I’ve made—Michelle doesn’t. But you know what I believe."  President Obama: “Last night, Gov. Romney looked you right in the eye and tried to pretend that he never said ‘let Detroit go bankrupt.’”  President Obama: “I will never turn Medicare into a voucher. Governor Romney doubled down on this proposal last night, and he’s wrong.” 
"The choice you make tomorrow is not just between two candidates or two parties. It’s a choice between two different visions of America."  President Obama: "Joe Biden is literally a man who is in love with a teacher."  President Obama: “We cannot afford to double down on the same top-down economic policies that got us into this mess." #ForwardNotBack 
"We’ve made real progress these past four years. But Iowa, we’re here tonight because we’ve got more work to do." —President Obama  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the stark choice we face in this election.   President Obama: "Thank goodness somebody is finally getting tough on Big Bird." 
"The war in Afghanistan is ending. Al Qaeda is on the run. And Osama bin Laden is dead." —President Obama  Delray, Florida comes out to meet President Obama:   On Romney: “When he was asked what he’d do to cut the deficit & reduce spending, he said he’d eliminate funding for public television.” 
"Today, our businesses have created nearly 5.5 million new jobs. The American auto industry is back. Home values are on the rise."  Watch the President explain his detailed plan to move us forward: “And by the way, the math in my plan adds up.”   “Here’s the truth: Gov. Romney cannot pay for his $5 trillion tax plan without blowing up the deficit or sticking it to the middle class.” 
"In 2008, we were in the middle of two wars and the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression."  "There's no quit in America." President Obama on his plans for a second term:  #Forward2012  President Obama: “Gov. Romney may dance around his positions, but if you want to be President, you owe the American people the truth.” 
"When the cynics said we couldn't: You said 'Yes we can.' You said 'Yes we can,' and we did." —President Obama  Obama: "I’m asking for your vote. I’m asking you to help me finish the job."  #GottaVote  On Romney: “The man onstage last night—he does not want to be held accountable for what the real Romney’s been saying for the last year.” 
"To all of you who’ve lived and breathed the hard work of change: I want to thank you. You took this campaign and made it your own."  Obama: "You can declare you want America to remain a country where no matter who you are or what you look like, you can make it if you try."  President Obama’s on Romney’s false claims about his tax plan: “The fellow on stage last night said he didn't know anything about that.” 
"I've come back to Iowa one more time to ask for your vote. I came back to ask you to help us finish what we started." —President Obama  "You can choose the top-down policies that got us into this mess—or you can choose the policies that are getting us out of this mess."  POTUS: “The real Romney has been running around the country for the last year promising $5 trillion in tax cuts that favor the wealthy.” 
Happening now: President Obama speaks at the final rally of his final campaign.   President Obama: "Finally, my plan will use the savings from ending the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan to put our people back to work."  President Obama: “When I got on stage, I met this very spirited fellow who claimed to be Mitt Romney. It couldn't have been Mitt Romney.” 
"We cannot turn back now. We need to keep moving this country forward." —First Lady Michelle Obama  "Fourth, my plan will cut the deficit by $4 trillion over the next 10 years in a balanced way, by cutting spending that we don’t need."  We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
"Tomorrow, we get the chance to finish what we started here in Iowa."—  Obama: "Third, my plan will make it a national mission to educate our kids and train our workers better than anyone else in the world."  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Colorado about the choice we face in this election.  
Watch live: President Obama's final campaign rally in Des Moines, Iowa.   President Obama: "Second, my plan will cut our oil imports in half by 2020, so that we control more of our own energy in America."  33 days left in this campaign, but voter registration deadlines are right around the corner. Register here now:  
This all started around kitchen tables and at county fairs here in Iowa. We've come a long way, and it's always great to be back. -bo  Obama: "First, my plan builds on our manufacturing growth by ending the tax breaks for companies that ship jobs overseas." #MadeInAmerica  What Romney failed to deliver on last night: the facts.  
Under President Obama, we’ve added 5.4 million private-sector jobs over 32 straight months:    President Obama: "My plan actually will move America forward. And by the way, the math in my plan adds up."  What Romney failed to deliver on last night: the facts.  
The President is helping millions more students afford college:    Obama on Romney: "His foreign policy is from the 1980s, his social policy is from the 1950s, and his economic policies are from the 1920s."  Fact check: Romney's tax claims challenged by nonpartisan report.  
Presidents tried to reform our health care system for decades. This one got the job done:   "He’s doing everything he can to hide his real positions and win this election by telling us everything he thinks is wrong with America."  The choice in this election couldn't be clearer. Pitch in $5 to help make sure President Obama keeps us moving forward:  
President Obama kept his promise to end the war in Iraq:   Obama: "We joke about #Romnesia. But this is about trust. And there’s no more serious issue in a presidential campaign than trust."  "Mitt Romney spent the night on the defensive, doubled down on the same bad ideas that crashed the economy." -@Messina2012 
Rainbow Ohio:   "If you say you love Medicare, but your plan turns it into a voucher that ends the guaranteed benefit of Medicare—you've got #Romnesia."  Jim Messina: "The President spoke directly to voters tonight about his vision for an economy that grows from the middle out." 
Three guys hanging out backstage in Columbus:   "If you say that you love American cars during a debate—but you wrote an article titled 'Let Detroit Go Bankrupt'—you might have #Romnesia."  If you’re feeling fired up, RT this link to make sure your friends and family are registered to vote:  #TeamObama 
FACT: America’s dependence on foreign oil has reached a 20-year low, down 25% since President Obama took office. #Forward  President Obama: "We had a severe outbreak last night—it was at least stage 3 #Romnesia."  Make sure your friends know: President Obama's the choice to move us forward, not back.   
FACT: President Obama doubled funding for Pell Grants, increasing the number of recipients to nearly 10 million students. #Forward  President Obama: "We've come up with a name for this condition. It’s called #Romnesia."  Tonight, President Obama laid out his specific plan to keep us moving forward, not back:  #TeamObama 
FACT: President Obama kept his promise to end the war in Iraq. Romney called the decision to bring our troops home “tragic.”  “Last night, he said he always supported taking out bin Laden. But in ’08, he said it wasn’t worth ‘moving heaven & earth’ to catch 1 man.”  President Obama: "I promised I’d fight every single day on behalf of the American people. I've kept that promise." 
FACT: Thanks to Obamacare, insurance companies won’t be able to charge women more than men for the same coverage. #Forward  President Obama: “Last night, he claimed to support my plan to end the war in Afghanistan. But he has opposed a timeline.”  "Part of being principled and part of being a leader is being able to describe exactly what it is you intend to do."—President Obama 
FACT: Thanks to the President’s health care law, 3.1 million more young Americans under age 26 have health coverage. #Forward  President Obama: “We’re ending the war in Afghanistan because after a decade of war, it’s time to do some nation-building here at home.”  President Obama: "Let’s hire another 100,000 math and science teachers to make sure we maintain a technological lead." #Debate2012 
FACT: The first bill President Obama signed into law was the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act, which helps women fight for equal pay.  “The greatest responsibility I have as President is to keep the American people safe. That’s why I ended the war in Iraq.”—President Obama  POTUS: "The genius of America is the free enterprise system and freedom, and the fact that people can go out there and start a business." 
Under President Obama, we’ve accomplished a lot—and tomorrow's our chance to finish what we started:   President Obama: “Go to  I need you to vote, because you’ve got a very big choice to make.”  President Obama: "I believe the federal government has the capacity to help open up opportunity and create ladders of opportunity." 
President Obama ordered the raid on Osama bin Laden’s compound, eliminating the man responsible for the 9/11 attacks:   “Two weeks from today, Americans in all 50 states will step into a voting booth. But here in Florida, you get to start voting on Saturday.”  See how Obamacare benefits you:  #Debate2012 
President Obama in Ohio: "Another $5 trillion tax cut favoring the wealthy—not change."   President Obama: "I am fired up right now! It is good to be in Florida."  President Obama on one of the driving forces behind Obamacare: "It was families who were worried about going bankrupt if they got sick." 
President Obama: "Let's go vote. Let's go do this."  #Forward  We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest.  President Obama: "When you move to a voucher system, you are putting seniors at the mercy of insurance companies." #Debate2012 
President Obama: "If you're willing to work with me again, we'll win Ohio. We'll finish what we started." #Forward  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Florida about his plans to keep us moving forward.   POTUS on his grandmother: "She could be independent because of Social Security & Medicare. She had worked all her life, put in this money." 
Obama: "The auto worker who's back on the job building cars with pride and dignity—he needs a champion." #Forward  A round-up of what people are saying about President Obama's clear win in last night's foreign policy debate:   President Obama on deficit reduction: "If we’re serious, we’ve got to take a balanced, responsible approach." 
President Obama: "I will work with anybody from any party to move this country forward."  The New York Times on last night’s debate: Romney “had little coherent to say and often sounded completely lost.”   President Obama on Romney's tax plan: "I think math, common sense, and our history shows us that’s not a recipe for job growth." 
Obama: "We know what real change is. We know what the future requires. We also know it won't be easy."  CNN's John King: "There's no question" the President won the debate. "He's the commander in chief."   "The auto industry has come roaring back, and housing has begun to rise."—President Obama 
President Obama: "Change is turning the page on a decade of war so we can do some nation-building here at home." #Forward  14 days from now, this election will be over. Get out and volunteer to help make sure the President wins this thing:   President Obama: "Over the last 30 months, we’ve seen 5 million jobs in the private sector created." 
Obama: "Don't tell me that students who can't afford college should just borrow money from their parents."  If you're #ProudOfObama tonight, help make sure this campaign has the resources it needs to win:   Watch live: President Obama discusses his specific plans to keep us moving forward in the first presidential debate.  
President Obama: "You know that I know what real change looks like because you've seen me fight for it."  If you’re #ProudOfObama and how he has fought for us over the past four years, stand with him for four more:   It’s go time. RT if you’ve got the President’s back in tonight’s debate:  
President Obama on Romney: "We know what change looks like, and what he's selling ain't it."  Jim Messina: "Tonight America saw its commander in chief and someone who’s not ready to be commander in chief." #ProudOfObama  President Obama’s plan to keep moving America forward:   
President Obama: "Our economy is stronger when everybody can count on affordable health insurance." #Forward  To quote Bob Schieffer's mom: "Go vote." Commit to support President Obama here:   Tune in here at 9pm ET to watch President Obama in tonight’s debate, and get the facts you need to get his back:  
"We've made real progress, Ohio, but we've got more work to do. Our work is not yet done."—President Obama in Columbus  President Obama: "I will work every single day to make sure that America continues to be the greatest nation on earth."  Let your friends know: Registering to vote takes less than 5 minutes, and you can get it done right here.  #RegToVote 
President Obama: "We're all in this together. We rise or fall as one nation, as one people."  Obama: "I want to make sure we've got the best education system in the world, and we’re retaining our workers for the jobs of tomorrow."  Mitt Romney hasn't put forth any specific ideas for how to create jobs or strengthen the middle class:  
President Obama on Jay Z and Bruce Springsteen: “Not only are they all on my iPod, but both of them tell an American story.”  "We've made real progress digging our way out of policies that gave us two wars & the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression."  Tonight, the President will discuss his specific plans to create 1 million manufacturing jobs, double exports, & cut oil imports in half. 
“Hello, Columbus! Hello, Ohio! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?”—President Obama  President Obama: "I’ve put forward a plan to make sure that we’re bringing manufacturing jobs back to our shores."  Debate prep: Make sure your friends know President Obama’s plan to keep us moving forward.   
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the choice in this election. RT so your friends can watch, too.   "Governor, the people in Detroit don’t forget."—President Obama #StrongerWithObama  Happy anniversary to the Obamas—sign their card:   
Jay Z: "Ohio, could you make some noise for your President—Barack Obama!" #Forward  Romney now: "I like American cars." Romney in 2008: "Let Detroit go bankrupt."  A lot of amazing women are standing with the President—including a few familiar faces:  
Jay Z in Columbus: "Y'all ready for 4 more years?" #Forward  The Romney-Ryan jobs plan could create 73,000 jobs—in China:  #RomneyWrong  Cheer on President Obama in good company tonight. Find a debate watch party near you:  #Forward2012 
"Are we ready to move forward, Ohio?" —Jay Z in Columbus  President Obama won tonight’s debate because his leadership has made us stronger, safer & more secure. #ProudOfObama   Twenty years together:   
Watch live: Jay-Z fires up the crowd before President Obama’s rally in Columbus, Ohio.  #Forward  President Obama: "My attitude coming into office was that we are going to insist that China plays by the same rules as everybody else."  Only 34 days until Election Day. RT if you’re excited to cheer on President Obama in tonight’s debate. 
Make sure your friends show up to the polls tomorrow—pass on this link:   President Obama: "We've created partnerships throughout the region to deal with extremism—in Somalia, in Pakistan, in Yemen."  Twenty years ago today, I married the love of my life and my best friend. Happy anniversary, Michelle. -bo 
"If you want to make your voice heard, you've got to show up." —President Obama:   President Obama: "After a decade of war, it’s time to do some nation building here at home." #StrongerWithObama  Voter registration deadlines are coming up fast. RT this link to make sure your friends are registered & ready to vote:  
Help win tomorrow by calling voters in key states today:    On the Afghan transition: "There’s no reason why Americans should die when Afghans are perfectly capable of defending their own country."  Watch tomorrow night’s first presidential debate with Obama supporters in your community:  #Forward2012 
If you’re in Columbus, OH, come on down to Nationwide Arena now to see President Obama, Jay Z, & Bruce Springsteen this afternoon. #Forward  President Obama: "I look at what we need to get done to keep the American people safe and to move our interests forward." #StrongerWithObama  Special pizza delivery in Nevada:  
Boss hug:   Obama to Romney: "I said if I had bin Laden in our view, I would take a shot. You said we shouldn't move heaven and earth to get one man."  FACT: Nonpartisan tax experts say Romney’s plan would force middle-class families with kids to pay $2,000 more a year in taxes. 
President Obama speaking to a crowd of 18,000 in Madison: The middle class needs a champion in Washington.   Obama: "Governor, the problem is that on a whole range of issues, the Middle East, Afghanistan, Iraq... you've been all over the map."  FACT: Romney & Ryan have refused to provide specifics about how they’ll pay for their $5 trillion tax cut that’s skewed toward the wealthy. 
Forward, Wisconsin!   President Obama: "Iran is at its weakest point economically, strategically, militarily than in many years." #StrongerWithObama  FACT: President Obama’s plan includes creating 1 million new manufacturing jobs, doubling U.S. exports, and cutting our oil imports in half. 
Thanks to everyone who is knocking on doors and making calls—you inspire me every day. I won't let up if you won't. -bo  "When I came into office the world was divided. Iran was resurgent."—President Obama  In tomorrow night’s debate, President Obama will continue to lay out his specific plans to move us forward:  
Obama: “It is the dreams of our children that will be our saving grace. That is what will propel us forward.”  "The strength that we have shown in Iran is shown by the fact that we have been able to mobilize the world."—President Obama  Five minutes that could make a big difference in November: Get registered to vote today.  
President Obama: "The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read late at night."  President Obama on Iran: "We have put in the toughest, most crippling sanctions ever." #StrongerWithObama  Elections do have consequences. For Ian, it was getting his dad back.  
President Obama: "I'm not going to turn Medicare into a voucher to pay for a millionaire's tax cut."  "We’re not going to allow Iran to perpetually engage in negotiations that lead nowhere."—President Obama  Tomorrow night’s debate is a huge moment in this campaign. Cheer on the President with supporters in your community:  
Obama: “Change comes when we live up to this country’s legacy of innovation. I could not be prouder that I bet on American workers.”  Video: Defense Minister Ehud Barak—Obama “strong supporter” of Israel:  #StrongerWithObama  Just 35 days left in this campaign, and some states are already voting. Make sure you’re registered and ready to vote:  
President Obama: "We're not just building cars again. We're building better cars." #Forward  The clear choice on protecting Israel. #StrongerWithObama   You may need a tissue after watching this video:  
Obama: “I said we’d repeal ‘Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,’ we ended it. I said we’d crack down on reckless practices on Wall Street, and we did.”  President Obama: "When I sent young men and women into harm’s way, I always understand that that is the last resort, not the first resort."  For millions of women and their families, this is what change looks like:  
President Obama: "I said that I'd end the war in Iraq, and I ended it. I said I'd pass health care reform, and I passed it." #Forward  "The disagreement I have with Gov. Romney is that... he has often talked as if we should take premature military action."—President Obama  The easiest, most important thing you could do today: Register to vote, in less than five minutes.  
President Obama: "You know that I say what I mean and I mean what I say." #Forward  President Obama: "We cannot afford to have a nuclear arms race in the most volatile region of the world." #StrongerWithObama  This is what registering voters sounds like:  #RegToVote 
Obama on Romney: "Changing the facts when they're inconvenient to your campaign—not change."  President Obama: "A nuclear Iran is a threat to our national security and it’s a threat to Israel’s national security." #StrongerWithObama  State by state, city by city: See how President Obama’s policies are helping people in your area with this cool map.  
President Obama: "Ruling out compromise by pledging to rubber-stamp the Tea Party's agenda in Congress—that's not change."  "I will stand with Israel if they are attacked."—President Obama  FACT: Gov. Romney left Massachusetts a billion-dollar deficit and the highest debt per person of any state in the country. 
Obama on Romney: "He’s tried as hard as he can to repackage the same old bad ideas and make them out to be new ideas.”  President Obama: "As long as I'm President of the United States, Iran will not get a nuclear weapon." #StrongerWithObama  FACT: Romney created or raised more than 1,000 taxes and fees in Massachusetts, despite promising that he wouldn’t raise taxes. 
President Obama on Gov. Romney: "We know what change looks like—and what he's selling ain't it."  President Obama: "I think Governor Romney hasn't spent enough time looking at how our military works." #StrongerWithObama  FACT: Under Gov. Romney, Massachusetts fell to 47th out of 50 states in job creation, even as the national economy was growing. 
Obama: “We believe our country is better when people can count on Medicare and Social Security in their golden years.” #Forward  Obama: "Gov. Romney has called for $5 trillion of tax cuts that he says he's going to pay for by closing deductions. The math doesn’t work."  A story told in three photos:  
President Obama: “As long as there’s a single American who wants a job but can’t find one, we’ve got more work to do.” #Forward  POTUS: "Taking us back to the strategies that got us into this mess is not the way we are going to maintain leadership in the 21st century."  Your vote is your voice—it's time to speak up:  #RegToVote 
“Today, our businesses have created nearly 5.5 million jobs. The American auto industry is back on top. Home values are on the rise.”  FACT: By the time Gov. Romney left office, more businesses were going out of business in Massachusetts than being created.  “We have come so far. We have seen so much. But there’s so much more to do.”  #Forward2012 
Obama: "We rise and fall as one nation and one people."  How small businesses fared in Massachusetts under Governor Romney:  #RomneyWrong  The coolest thing about a record 10,000,000 donations in 2012: every donation you make now sets a new one. Keep going:  
President Obama: "No matter how bad the storm is, we recover together. We're all in this together." #Forward  President Obama to Romney: "When you were in Massachusetts, small business development ranked about 48th out of 50."  Thank you for all you've done for this campaign, and all you'll do in the next 36 days to win this.  
President Obama in Wisconsin: “I cannot imagine not being fired up after listening to Bruce Springsteen.”  President Obama: "We’ve got to make sure we reduce our deficit. Unfortunately Governor Romney’s plan doesn’t do it." #StrongerWithObama  Last night, this campaign reached 10,000,000 donations in 2012—a huge milestone and a historic record for grassroots politics. 
Watch live: President Obama kicks off the last day of the campaign in Madison, Wisconsin.   "What we also have been able to do is position ourselves so we can start rebuilding America, and that’s what my plan does."—President Obama  Make the 10 millionth donation of 2012—only 1,416 left to go:  
Thanks to President Obama, gay and lesbian servicemembers don't have to lie about who they are to serve their country:   POTUS: "Because we ended the war in Iraq, we were able to refocus our attention on... beginning a transition process in Afghanistan."  Thanks to you, we’re just 18,000 grassroots donations away from 10 million. Pitch in $5 or more to help make it happen:  
Share why you’ve got the President’s back in this election using the hashtag #Forward.  "The world needs a strong America—and it is stronger now than when I came into office." #StrongerWithObama  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Nevada about the choice we face in this election.  
Margaret, MD: “I am a female small business owner, and my business has grown tremendously since Obama took office.”  "These countries can’t develop if young women are not given the kind of education that they need."—President Obama   RT Holy Moly!!! 
“I know where he stands and I know he'll work to accomplish everything he started.”—George from Virginia on why he’s voting for Obama  Romney said bringing our troops home from Iraq was "tragic":  #RomneyWrong  Time to step up for the 4th quarter of this campaign. Pitch in $5 now to help win this thing:   
RaShar, MI: “I was born with sickle cell anemia. Obamacare helps people with pre-existing conditions (like me) get health care coverage.”  President Obama on Romney: "Just a few weeks ago, you said you think we should have more troops in Iraq right now." #RomneyWrong  Sign up for Quick Donate to show your support for President Obama at the touch of a button:  
Josh, a Navy vet in NC: “I’m voting for President Obama because the Post-9/11 G.I. Bill is enabling me to finish my bachelor’s degree.”  Obama: "One thing I’ve learned as commander in chief: You’ve got to be clear, both to our allies & our enemies, about where you stand."  A quick lesson in Quick Donate, from and  
People have a lot of reasons for voting Obama-Biden this year—stay tuned for a few. #Forward  President Obama on Romney: "When it comes to our foreign policy, you seem to want to import the foreign policies of the 1980s." #RomneyWrong  Less than 100,000 grassroots donations to go by midnight. Let's hit that goal:   
Help win this election by making sure your friends and family vote. RT this link so they know where to do it:   POTUS on Romney: "A few months ago, when you were asked what’s the biggest geopolitical threat facing America, you said Russia."  “I give because I’m thinking about my grandchildren and my great-grandchildren.”—Sarah, NC:  
It was up to you then, and it’s up to you now. Let’s do this:   President Obama on Romney: "Your strategy, previously, has been all over the map, and is not designed to keep Americans safe."  Deadline deal: Pitch in $10 or more now to help re-elect the President and get your Obama 2012 car magnet.  
For this last day of the campaign, the President will travel to Wisconsin and Ohio before a final rally in Iowa:   "We are now able to transition out of Afghanistan in a responsible way, making sure that Afghans take responsible for their own security."  We’re just 212,451 grassroots donations away from 10 million for the year. Pitch in $5?   
People started lining up before dawn for today's first rally in Madison, WI (we'll be tweeting from   President Obama: "We ended the war in Iraq, refocused ourselves on who actually attacked us on 9-11." #StrongerWithObama  Vote to protect your friends’ right to get married and serve their country no matter who they love:  
Tomorrow’s Election Day. Help determine where our country goes for the next 4 years—get out the vote now:   President Obama: "My first job as commander in chief is to keep the American people safe, and that's what we've done over the last 4 years."  We're facing a big FEC fundraising deadline tonight—and your donation will go further now than it will next week:  
Forward in Cincy:   Watch live: In the final debate, President Obama lays out how he's making America stronger, safer & more secure.   Meet Margaret: She just turned 106, she first voted in 1928, and she can’t wait to vote for President Obama this fall.  
The choice on education:   Follow tonight for live fact checks and analysis of the final presidential debate.  Your $10 donation means more now than ever. Help re-elect the President (and get a car magnet!) today:  
In Cincinnati, Ohio, President Obama lays out the stakes for the middle class in this election:   #PromiseKept:   Supporters around the country were fired up to register voters yesterday. Check out some of the photos:  #RegToVote 
Obama: “After all we've been through together, we can’t stop now. We've got to come together and bring more change to America.” #Forward2012  Foreign policy heavyweights break down the stark contrast between the President & Gov. Romney on Iran:  #RomneyNotReady  Election Day is 37 days away. Pitch in $5 or more before tonight's critical fundraising deadline:  
President Obama: "You know where I stand, and you know what I believe. You know that I tell the truth."  President Obama delivered on his promise to bring our troops home from Iraq—and fight for them when they come home:   Pitch in to re-elect the President—donate $10 to Obama for America by texting GIVE to 62262. 6 msgs/mth  
President Obama: "Gov. Romney's been having a tough time here in Ohio because everyone knows he was against saving the auto industry."  President Obama refocused our efforts on taking out al-Qaeda’s leadership, including Osama bin Laden:   If you help hire another organizer now, they'll have more time to do their job and reach more voters. Pitch in:  
“We believe in the strivers, the dreamers, the risk takers. We know they've always been the driving force behind our economic growth.”  If you're on #TeamObama tonight, show it with just a couple clicks:   Mitt Romney’s corporate experience wasn't about creating jobs. It was about profit, even at the expense of workers:  
Obama: “This nation cannot succeed without a thriving middle class, and sturdy ladders for anyone hoping to get into the middle class.”  Honoring our sacred trust:   Your donation will go further now than it will next week. Pitch in $5 now:  
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the stark choice we face in this election.   A look at how President Obama has honored our sacred trust with veterans:   “We’re doing better with his plan than we were before.” Constance shares why she’s investing in the next four years:  
Four years ago today:   Out of many, we are one:   Check out how President Obama is fighting to make college more affordable—then pass this on:  
Speaking in Florida, President Obama lays out the stakes in this election:   President Obama ended the Iraq war. Romney would have left 30,000 troops there, and called bringing them home “tragic”:   Only 38 days left in this campaign. Pitch in $5 or more now, when it matters most, to help this campaign win:  
President Obama refused to let the American auto industry die:   All bluster & no specific plans: Here are the foreign policy questions Romney needs to answer tonight.  #RomneyNotReady  Grab a friend today and get in on one of the biggest voter registration pushes of this campaign:  
“Our jobs don’t stop at getting out the truth. We need to get out the vote, too.” A final fact-check from   “He did what he said he was going to do.” Eli and Seth, twin brothers and veterans, on why they support the President:   Last call: Meet President Obama and President Clinton on the campaign trail next week, airfare included.  
This election could come down to just a handful of votes. Find out where to cast yours:    The choice for commander in chief: President Obama’s four years of strong leadership vs. Mitt Romney’s poor judgment.   Only 6 Saturdays left before Election Day. Bring a friend to a weekend of action event near you:  
President Obama: "No matter what happens, I’ll fight for you and your families every single day, as hard as I know how.” #Forward2012  FACT: President Obama has made clear that he will not let Iran obtain a nuclear weapon, & imposed the toughest sanctions on Iran in history.  You won't get another chance like this: Enter before midnight to meet President Obama and President Clinton.  
“You know I mean what I say and I say what I mean. I said I’d end the war in Iraq, and I did. I said I’d reform health care, and I did.”  FACT: President Obama has a plan to end the war in Afghanistan in 2014—Mitt Romney does not.  A high school teacher making $54,000 who's got three kids and is her household's primary source of income. #WrittenOffByRomney 
“Giving more power back to the biggest banks, that’s not change. Another $5 trillion in tax cuts for the wealthiest—that’s not change.”  FACT: President Obama refocused on the terrorists who attacked us—devastating al-Qaeda’s leadership and bringing Osama bin Laden to justice.  The average firefighter making $45,000 a year with a stay-at-home spouse and two kids. #WrittenOffByRomney 
Obama on Romney: “In this campaign, he’s tried as hard as he can to repackage these old ideas that didn't work and offer them up as change.”  FACT: President Obama kept his promise to end the war in Iraq. Romney called the decision to bring our troops home “tragic.”  U.S. soldiers in combat zones whose pay isn’t subject to federal income tax. #WrittenOffByRomney 
Obama: "We don’t want politicians in Washington, most of whom are male, to make health care decisions that women can make for themselves."  Mitt Romney is not ready to be commander in chief. Every time he’s had a chance to prove otherwise, he’s failed:   The vast majority of Americans Romney insulted pay federal payroll taxes, property taxes, sales taxes, and state taxes. 
"Our economy grows best, the markets do best, when everybody has a chance to succeed. When everybody has a good education.”—President Obama  President Obama’s leadership has made America stronger, safer, and more secure than we were four years ago:   A look at the 47% of Americans who Mitt Romney wrote off for not taking “personal responsibility for their lives.”  
President Obama: "You can join me in building a future that focuses on a strong and growing middle class."  15 days to go in this election. RT if you’ll be cheering on the President in tonight’s final debate:   Mitt Romney’s crocodile tears aren't likely to fool anyone heading into next week’s debate:  
President Obama: "We think America’s stronger when everybody can count on affordable, quality health insurance."  Make an #Obama2012 purchase today and get it by Election Day. 30% off orders of $10 or more with the code LASTCALL:   Too young to vote, old enough to volunteer.   
"Because of the sacrifice of our brave men and women in uniform, the war in Iraq is over. The war in Afghanistan is coming to a close."  One conversation could make the difference in this election—make a few calls to voters today:    We're facing a big FEC fundraising deadline—after this, there's only one more before Election Day. Pitch in $5 now:  
President Obama: "Today, our businesses have created nearly 5 and a half million jobs." #progress  Former Sec. of State Albright on Romney: “The last thing we need to do is to go around making belligerent statements.”   Iowa saw huge turnout over yesterday's first day of early voting—let's keep it going:  
President Obama: "No matter how tough times are, we're all in this together. We rise and fall as one nation, as one people."  “Having these tall, beautiful, strong-willed girls in my house never allows me to underestimate women.”   Take it from The choice in this election is too important not to vote.  
"Hello, Florida! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?"—President Obama  Worth a RT: It’s time for Congress to join the President & help responsible homeowners refinance at low interest rates.   This is important: Help this campaign grow and get entered to meet Presidents Obama and Clinton on the trail.  
We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest.  “Without President Obama’s rescue of the auto industry, Ohio would have collapsed.”  #MadeInOhio  Just 39 days till Election Day. Pitch in $5 or more now to help win this thing in the final stretch:  
Happening now: President Obama speaks at a rally in Florida.  #Forward2012  A hero of war, George McGovern became a champion for peace. Michelle and I share our thoughts and prayers with his family. -bo  Go behind the scenes on the campaign trail on the road to Election Day:  
FACT: Romney has said it’s “fair” for him to pay a lower tax rate than a worker making $50,000, despite making nearly $14 million last year.  Foreign policy leaders explain why President Obama is the only candidate qualified to lead America on the world stage:   Don't wait to make your campaign donation—your contribution makes the biggest difference right now:  
FACT: Romney can't pay for his $5 trillion in tax cuts that favor the wealthy without raising middle-class taxes or exploding the deficit.  A few folks you might know on what the President’s support for the #LGBT community has meant to them:   Do you live near a battleground state? This weekend’s the perfect time for a road trip:  
FACT: President Obama’s plan extends tax cuts for 97% of America's small business owners. #progress  In 16 days, all the votes will be counted. Get out and volunteer to help win this thing in the final stretch:   If you pitch in by midnight tomorrow, your donation could help get you introduced to two American presidents:  
FACT: President Obama has signed 18 tax cuts that are helping small businesses grow and create jobs. #progress  Cecile Richards on President Obama: "He has a strong record we can trust."   People in some states are already voting—so this election has begun. Make sure you’re ready:   
FACT: Since taking office, President Obama has cut taxes for the typical American family by $3,600. #progress  Lilly Ledbetter knows that equal pay for equal work isn't just a women’s issue—it’s a family issue:   An easy way to donate $10 to this campaign: Text GIVE to 62262. 6 msgs/mth.  
Before your friends vote, make sure they know the choice on taxes in this election:   In Fairfax, Virginia: A kid for Obama.   President Obama: “If I could sit down with you in your living room or around your kitchen table, here’s what I’d say.”  
The crowd in Concord:   Cecile Richards: "Mitt Romney would not only set us back four years—he'd set us back 40 years in America."  #Romnesia  “If we rally around a new kind of economic patriotism, we will rebuild this economy together. We will rebuild the middle class together.” 
"We know what change looks like. And what he's selling ain't it." —President Obama on Mitt Romney's failed policies:   You've picked your candidate—now pick a state and color for your custom Obama tee. Use the code CUSTOM5 to get $5 off:   “We believe America only works when we accept certain responsibilities for ourselves, and also for others.”—President Obama 
The President, speaking to a record crowd in New Hampshire this morning: We know that our ideas work and theirs don't.   "I stand by what I said, whatever it was."  #Romnesia  President Obama on the Romney-Ryan mindset: “If you can’t afford to go to college, borrow money from your parents.” 
President Obama in Virginia last night: This election is "a choice between two very different visions for our future."   See how Obamacare is making health care more affordable for millions of Americans:  #ACA  President Obama on the GOP: “Their theory is if you can’t afford health insurance, hope you don’t get sick.” 
If there's one thing we learned in 2008, it's that nothing is more powerful than millions of voices calling for change.   .@GeorgeTakei, and more share why they support President Obama:  #LGBT  “We’ve got a new tower across the New York skyline, al Qaeda is on the path to defeat, and bin Laden is dead.”—President Obama 
Sunday, Monday, Election Day—that’s all the time we have left to win this thing. Sign up to help get out the vote now:   Only 17 days left to get out the vote—which makes this the perfect weekend to volunteer:   “My opponent thinks it’s fair that someone who makes $20 million a year like him pays a lower rate than a cop or a teacher who makes $50K.” 
President Obama in Virginia: “That's how democracy is supposed to be. It's up to you. You've got the power.” #Forward2012  Virginian women for Obama:   President Obama: “The typical family has seen their tax burden go down about $3,600 on the federal level because of our policies.” 
Watch live: President Clinton and President Obama in Bristow, Virginia.   “I don’t know if he knows how many lives he’s changing by just saying that simple thing. He's saving lives.”  #LGBT  “Help us keep tuition costs down for young people all across this country. They deserve opportunity just like I had opportunity.” 
Here's what getting out the vote looks like (there's still time to get involved!):   Share this if you agree: We can’t afford a president with #Romnesia in the Oval Office.   POTUS: “We can decide that in the United States of America, no child should have her dream deferred because of an overcrowded classroom.” 
Your friends should see this before they vote:   “Obama understands that the backbone of the American Dream is innovation and entrepreneurship.”  (via  POTUS: “I wasn’t born into wealth or privilege, but I got a great education because I was born here in the United States of America.” 
Haaretz: "Obama is good for Israel."   If you missed President Obama on the Daily Show yesterday, watch the interview and pass it on:    President Obama: “When my opponent said we should let Detroit go bankrupt—no, don’t boo. Vote!”  
"Change comes when we live up to this country’s legacy of innovation." —President Obama in Wisconsin   In April, Romney’s campaign said “we’ll get back to you” on whether he supports an #EqualPay law. We're still waiting:   POTUS: “It’s time for a new economic patriotism, rooted in the belief that growing our economy begins with a strong & growing middle class.” 
Wisconsin for Obama:   FACT: Romney claims he wouldn’t take away a woman’s right to choose—but said he’d be “delighted” to sign a law banning abortion. #Romnesia  “We believe in something called opportunity. We believe in a country where hard work pays off & responsibility is rewarded.”—President Obama 
“I will do anything to get you to go out and vote on November 6th.” Will Ferrell’s not kidding:   FACT: Romney tried to hide his extreme stance on birth control, but he has supported laws that would let employers deny coverage. #Romnesia  President Obama: “I don’t think we can get very far with leaders who write off half the nation as a bunch of victims.” 
"I keep my word, and I want to keep fighting for you." —President Obama  FACT: Romney claims he supports equal pay for equal work, but refuses to say whether he supports the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act. #Romnesia  “We succeed when the middle class gets bigger, when there are ladders of opportunity for those striving to get into the middle class.” 
"You know where I stand. You know what I believe. You know that I mean what I say and I say what I mean." —President Obama  Forgetting what your own "severely conservative" positions are, and hoping voters will too: that's #Romnesia.   President Obama in Virginia: “Today I believe that as a nation, we’re moving forward again.” 
"Changing the facts when they're inconvenient to your campaign—that's definitely not change." —President Obama  Good news: Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions—like "#Romnesia."   Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about the choice we face in this election.  
"Ruling out compromise, pledging to rubber-stamp the Tea Party's agenda in Congress—that's not change." —President Obama  "You can let them turn back the clock 50 years for immigrants, and gays, and women–or you can stand up and say 'I want to move forward.'"  Organizers on the ground are counting on you to ramp up their work in battleground states. Pitch in $5 or more today:  
"We know what change looks like. And what Governor Romney's offering ain't it." —President Obama in Wisconsin  “If you've come down with #Romnesia and can’t remember the promises you've made, don’t worry—Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions.”  40 days until Election Day. RT this if you’re registered and ready to vote for President Obama!  
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Wisconsin.   “If you say you’ll protect a woman’s right to choose but you say you’d be ‘delighted’ to sign a law outlawing it, you've got #Romnesia.”  The election is over in 41 days, and we all have a stake in the outcome. Step up this weekend:  
President Obama in Mentor, Ohio today: "We rise or fall as one nation, as one people."   “If you say women should have access to contraceptive care but you support laws that would let employers deny it, you've got #Romnesia.”  Reading this on your phone? Pitch in $10 to Obama for America right now by texting GIVE to 62262. 6 msgs/mth.  
The final push: It's on us.   “If you say you’re for equal pay for equal work but you refuse to say whether you’d sign a bill that protects it, you might have #Romnesia.”  FACT: Romney would have to raise taxes on middle-class families with kids by $2,000 to pay for $250,000 tax cuts for multimillionaires. 
12 must-share facts about President Obama’s record:   President Obama: "He’s conveniently forgetting what his own positions are ... We need a name for this condition—let’s call it #Romnesia.”  FACT: Romney’s plan to give millionaires a massive tax cut would either raise taxes for the middle class or explode the deficit. 
The President picked up the phone to thank a few of the volunteers who built this campaign:   President Obama: Obamacare “has secured new access to preventive care like mammograms and cancer screenings with no co-pay, no deductible.”  FACT: Romney has said it’s “fair” for him to pay a lower tax rate than a worker making $50,000, despite making nearly $14 million last year. 
3 days left—no time to waste. Help get out the vote this weekend:  #Forward2012  President Obama: “The only person who should make decisions about your health care is you.”  Mitt Romney thinks it’s “fair” that multimillionaires like himself pay a lower tax rate than middle-class families:  
Goodbye, Rufus:   “I don’t think your boss should decide what’s best for your health and safety. I don’t think your insurer should decide what care you get.”  President Obama: "I still believe in one nation and one people. I still believe in you. And if you still believe in me, I need your vote." 
You can help win this election right now. Pick up your phone and call voters in key states:  #Forward2012  President Obama: “Gov. Romney says he’s going to get rid of funding for Planned Parenthood.”  President Obama: "I’m not fighting to create Democratic jobs or Republican jobs. I’m fighting to create American jobs." 
President Obama: “They’re betting on cynicism. Ohio, my bet is on you.”  #Forward2012  POTUS: “This isn’t just a women’s issue. No man should want his wife or his daughters paid less than a man for doing the same job.”  "On election night [in 2008], I said to all of those Americans who didn’t vote for me—I may not have won your vote, but I hear your voices." 
This is the choice on choice:    President Obama: “In the 21st century, a woman deserves equal pay for doing equal work.”  "What kind of inside job is [Romney] talking about? Is he talking about the inside job to rubber-stamp the agenda of this GOP Congress?" 
What’s your reason for voting Obama-Biden? Share your story:  #Forward2012  President Obama: “Even his own running mate said he’s 'kind of a throwback to the ‘50s'."  POTUS: "My opponent doesn’t understand this concept about how change happens. He said, ‘I’m going to get the job done from the inside.’" 
Teresa from Virginia on why she’s voting for President Obama: “He has a real plan for rescuing the economy that passes the ‘math’ test.”  President Obama on Romney’s stance on women: “Gov. Romney wants to take us back to policies more suited for the 1950s.” 
Steven, FL: “I am voting for Barack Obama and Joe Biden because I can trust them to care for the middle class & restore the American dream.”  President Obama: “In 18 days, you’re going to step into a voting booth. And you’re going to have a very big choice to make.” 
Peter D. from California on why he's voting to re-elect the President: “Obama has been a man of his word.”  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about what’s at stake in this election.  
“Obamacare opened the door to my career in healthcare IT training. He cares for the 100%.”—Shana, TX, on why she’s voting Obama-Biden  There's a lot at stake for women in this election. Cecile Richards lays out the choice we face:  #Women2012 
"We are not finished yet. We've got more work to do." —President Obama in Ohio:   18 days to go, and it’s all hands on deck. Sign up to volunteer this weekend:  #Forward2012 
How the Romney-Ryan campaign lost its own credibility in five easy steps:   Fired up in Ohio:  
You need to see this video, and then your friends need to see this video:   “I can’t in good conscience vote for Mitt Romney.” Margaret, a Republican, on why she’s voting for the President:  
Colorado: Today's your last chance to vote early for President Obama. Get it done now:   Equal pay for equal work. A woman's right to make her own health decisions. This is what's at stake in this election:  
“The future will never have as many lobbyists as the status quo. But those children are our future, and that’s who we’re fighting for.”  FACT: By repealing Obamacare, Romney would allow insurance companies to continue charging women more than men for the same coverage. 
“The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read every night. The men & women I meet on the campaign trail every day.”  FACT: Romney would defund Planned Parenthood, which millions of women rely on for health services like birth control and cancer screenings. 
President Obama: “I’m a long ways away from giving up on this fight. I've got a lot of fight left in me." #Forward2012  FACT: Romney would appoint Supreme Court justices who would overturn Roe v. Wade. 
“As long as I’m President, we’re not going to turn Medicare into a voucher just to pay for another millionaire’s tax cut.” #Forward2012  FACT: Mitt Romney said he’d “be delighted” to sign a bill outlawing abortion.  
President Obama: “This is not a game. These are people’s jobs. These are people’s lives.” #MadeInAmerica  A message from The Boss:  
Obama on Romney's misleading Jeep ads: “The car companies themselves have told Gov. Romney to knock it off.”  “In 19 days, you can choose to turn back the clock 50 years for immigrants, gays, women—or you can stand up and say I want to move forward.” 
Obama on the GOP: “They tried this ‘you’re on your own economics.' What did we get? Falling incomes, record deficits, & an economic crisis.”  “In 19 days, you get to choose the top-down policies that got us into this mess—or the policies that are getting us out of this mess.” 
President Obama: “We believe in a democracy where everybody’s voice is heard, where you can’t just buy an election.”  “Gov. Romney and his allies in Congress, they've banked on this idea that if you’re in America, you’re on your own. That’s not who we are.” 
President Obama: "We're here because we understand this nation cannot succeed without a growing, thriving middle class." #Forward2012  President Obama: “I’m not going to cut things like education. I’m not going to cut research that helps our economy.” 
4 days left—watch President Obama outline his plan to strengthen the middle class live from Springfield, OH:   President Obama on women’s health: “The health care law that we passed put those choices in your hands, where they belong.” #ACA 
Bill from Virginia shares how President Obama’s policies helped him start his small business:  #MadeInAmerica  President Obama on Romney’s stance on contraception: “He supported legislation that would turn those decisions over to a woman’s employer.” 
President Obama’s support for small businesses helped Steve’s wind manufacturing company hire more workers:   President Obama: "Women should make their own health care decisions." 
FACT: Since January 2010, we’ve added 479,000 manufacturing jobs—the biggest gains in that sector since the mid-1990s. #MadeInAmerica  “I don’t want my daughters, or your daughters, paid less than a man for doing the same job.”—President Obama 
FACT: Consumer confidence is at its highest level in 5 years, while foreclosures are at a 5-year low. #progress  President Obama: “I promised to cut taxes for small business owners—and we have, 18 times.” 
FACT: Under President Obama, our economy has added 5.4 million private-sector jobs over the last 32 months.   President Obama: "Today, America is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in two decades." 
President Obama's moving us forward, while Romney would take us back to the failed policies that crashed our economy:   President Obama: “We've doubled the amount of renewable energy we generate from sources like wind and solar.” 
"We’ve made real progress, but we’re here today because we know we have more work to do.” —President Obama  President Obama: “Unemployment has fallen from 10% to 7.8%. Home values are back on the rise. The stock market has nearly doubled.” 
President Obama: "We've created 5.4 million new jobs."  “Just about everybody who’s looked at his tax plan says he can’t pay for it without blowing a hole in the deficit or raising taxes.” 
President Obama in Ohio: "This morning we learned companies hired more workers in October than any time in the last 8 months." #Forward2012  President Obama on Romney: "When folks started crunching the numbers, his jobs plan fell apart even faster than his tax plan." 
4 days left to make sure President Obama gets 4 more years. Sign up to get out the vote this weekend:  #Forward2012  President Obama on Romney’s tax plan: “Instead of telling us how he’d pay for it, he said ‘I’ll let you know after the election.’” 
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Colorado about what’s at stake in this election.  #Forward2012  President Obama in New Hampshire: “We can’t grow this economy from the top down. This economy grows from the middle out." 
"We ought to keep on the track that we're on."—Colin Powell on why he's voting for President Obama:  #Forward2012  President Obama: "In 19 days, you're going to step into a voting booth, and you've got a big choice to make." 
The choice: A plan to grow the economy from the middle out—or a return to the failed policies that crashed it.   Watch live: President Obama speaks in New Hampshire about what’s at stake in this election.  #Forward2012 
President Obama: “The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read late at night.”   Forward, not back:   
5 things you might not know about President Obama:   Just 19 days left before Election Day. Volunteer this weekend to help win this thing:  #Forward2012 
If the President can make time to vote early, you should too. This is how it’s done:   Our new favorite t-shirt.  
President Obama: "I’m not giving up on the fight, and I hope you’re not either. I still need you fired up." #WeDecide  President Obama is fighting to make sure that our daughters have the same opportunities as our sons:  
President Obama: “Their bet is on cynicism. But Nevada, my bet’s on you. My bet’s on the decency and good sense of the American people.”  President Obama has a specific plan to create jobs and grow the economy. Mitt Romney doesn't:   
Obama: “Change comes when we live up to our legacy of innovation. I am proud that I bet on the American worker and American ingenuity.”  It’s Barack’s last FEC fundraising deadline before Election Day—pitch in $10 to help this campaign win:  
President Obama: “I know what real change looks like because I fought for it."  Do you have a favorite quote from this election? See if it made our top 47:  
President Obama: “You know what I believe, you know where I stand. You know I’m willing to make tough decisions.” #WeDecide  Any donation, no matter how large or small, helps to bring this election home for President Obama:  
“We believe that quality health care and a dignified retirement aren't just achievable goals—they’re a measure of our values as a nation.”  FACT: Romney didn't ask for resumes of qualified women to appoint in Massachusetts—a coalition of women’s groups gave them to him. 
President Obama: “We can meet these challenges. This is America. We've got the world’s best workers and the best entrepreneurs.” #WeDecide  FACT: Only 18 of the 65 judges Gov. Romney appointed in Massachusetts were women. #RomneysBinders 
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Nevada about the choice we face in this election.  #WeDecide  FACT: The number of women serving in economic positions in Gov. Romney’s administration dropped from 46% to 31% during his term in office. 
"We've come too far to turn back now." —President Obama in Green Bay, Wisconsin:   FACT: Over his final two years as governor of Massachusetts, Romney only filled 25% of new appointments with women. #RomneysBinders 
What’s your reason for voting Obama-Biden? Tweet your response, or tell your story here:   FACT: Mitt Romney opposed the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act, which was the first bill President Obama signed into law.  
“As a breast cancer survivor, I will never have to fear losing health care coverage.”—Lisa, NY  A look at why President Obama "scored a solid victory" last night:  #ObamaWinsDebate 
Jordan, VA: “President Obama is on track to fix our education system and put the United States back on top ... where it should be.”  "We understand that America is not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us, together, as one nation & one people." 
“Living in Toledo, I know what would have happened if the President hadn't stepped in to save the auto industry. Thank you.”—Twila, OH  "Gov. Romney said it’s fair that he pays a lower tax rate than a teacher who makes $50,000. He’s wrong."—President Obama 
Thomas, NY: “I'm voting for Barack Obama because I need to believe that I live in a country where compassion trumps self-interest.”  On Romney's opposition to the Fair Pay Act: "Last night, his top adviser finally admitted, no, the Governor didn't support that bill." 
People around the country are excited to vote for President Obama—here are just a few reasons why.  President Obama: "The Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act was the first bill I signed into law." #EqualPay 
"When I step into the voting booth, I think about the world I want to leave my 2 daughters." Bloomberg endorses Obama:   President Obama: "Our businesses have now added more than 5 million new jobs over the past two and a half years." #progress 
GOP former Sec. of State & retired four-star general Colin Powell on why he supports President Obama in this election:   President Obama: "When Gov. Romney said we should just let Detroit go bankrupt, we said thanks but no thanks." #MadeInAmerica 
This weekend is one of the last chances to get out the vote—pick up a shift for the President:   "We repealed 'Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,' so that no one is ever kicked out of the military because of who they are or who they love." 
"That's what change is." Watch President Obama lay out exactly what we're fighting for in this election:  #Forward2012  POTUS: "We got back every dime used to rescue the banks, and we passed a law to end taxpayer-funded Wall Street bailouts for good." 
“Together, we will renew those bonds and reaffirm that spirit that makes the United States of America the greatest nation on Earth.”  President Obama: "Four years ago, I told you we’d end the war in Iraq. We did." #PromiseKept 
Obama: “We have come too far to turn back now. We have come too far to let our hearts grow faint. Now is the time to keep pushing forward.”  President Obama on Mitt Romney: "His tax plan doesn’t add up. His jobs plan doesn’t create jobs." #SketchyDeal 
“The people who need a champion are the Americans whose letters I read late at night—the men and women I meet on the campaign trail.”  "You’ve heard of the New Deal. You’ve heard of the Fair Deal ... Mitt Romney’s trying to sell us the #SketchyDeal."—President Obama 
President Obama: “The folks at the very top in this country don’t need another champion in Washington."  POTUS: "Last night, Gov. Romney took another stab at trying to sell us on his $5 trillion tax cut that favors the wealthy." #SketchyDeal 
President Obama: "The future will never have as many lobbyists as the past." #Forward2012  President Obama on Romney's 1-point plan: "It’s the same philosophy that’s been squeezing middle-class families for more than a decade." 
“Despite all the resistance, despite all the setbacks, I've never lost sight of the vision we shared—that you would have a voice.”  President Obama: "We can’t grow this economy from the top down. We've got to grow this economy from the middle class out." 
President Obama: “I ran because the voices of the American people—your voices—had been shut out of our democracy for far too long.”  President Obama: "Hello, Iowa! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?" 
“We need a vision that says we don’t just look out for ourselves—we look out for one another other; we look out for future generations.”  We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s remarks on along for the latest. 
“We don’t need a partisan agenda—we need a common-sense agenda that says when we educate a poor child, we’ll all be better off.”  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Iowa about the stark choice we face in this election.  #Forward2012 
“We don’t need a big government agenda or a small government agenda—we need a middle-class agenda that rewards hard work & responsibility.”  Taegan Goddard: “He kept Romney on the defensive and came prepared … It was devastatingly effective.”  #ObamaWinsDebate 
President Obama: “I will never allow politicians in Washington to control health care choices that women should be making for themselves.”  Lois Romano: “The sense of the room is that Obama knocked it out of the park.”  #ObamaWinsDebate 
Obama: “As long as I’m President, I will never turn Medicare into a voucher just to pay for another millionaire’s tax cut.”  Mark Halperin: “I don’t think anyone can say Gov. Romney won this debate.”  #ObamaWinsDebate 
“No one who fights for this country should have to fight for a job, or a roof over their head, or the care they need when they come home.”  The reviews are in: President Obama won last night’s debate.  #ObamaWinsDebate 
Obama: “It’s time to use the savings from ending the wars in Iraq and Afghanistan to start paying down our debt and rebuilding America.”  "He was opposed to [the Lilly Ledbetter Act] at the time." —Romney campaign on their candidate's stance on equal pay.  
President Obama: "Change is finally turning the page on a decade of war to do some nation-building here at home."  "I've got two daughters and I want to make sure that they have the same opportunities that anybody's sons have."  
“Don’t tell me that students who can’t afford college should just borrow money from their parents.”  President Obama knows that when women make less than men for the same work, it threatens the economic security of entire families. 
“Don’t tell me that hiring more teachers won’t help this economy grow, or help young people compete.”  FACT: The first bill President Obama signed into law was the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act, which helps women fight for equal pay. 
President Obama: “You know that I’ll fight for you and your families every single day, as hard as I know how.”  Lilly Ledbetter: "Mitt Romney’s solution on leveling the playing field was to point out he once had a binder full of women applicants." 
President Obama: "I know what change looks like because I fought for it. You have too."  Last night, the President talked about women as breadwinners. Romney talked about them as resumes in “binders.”  
President Obama: “Giving more power back to the biggest banks isn't change. Leaving millions without health insurance isn't change.”  Here's what people are saying about President Obama's debate win:  
Obama: “Gov. Romney has been using all his talents as a salesman to dress up these very same policies that failed our country so badly.”  Worth a watch and a RT: President Obama’s closing statement from last night’s debate.  
Obama on Romney: "We know what change looks like, and what the Governor’s offering sure isn't it."  Mitt Romney still won’t say whether he’d stand up for equal pay, but he did tell us he has “binders full of women.”  
“We believe that quality health care and a dignified retirement aren't just achievable goals—they’re a measure of our values as a nation.”  From Gov. Romney's #SketchyDeal to his one-point plan, see whether your favorite quotes made this election's top 47:  
President Obama: “We grow faster when our tax code rewards hard work and companies that create jobs here in America.”  If you're fired up, commit to vote for President Obama right now:  #TeamBarack 
“We believe that if this country invests in the skills and ideas of its people, good jobs and businesses will follow.”  OFA Campaign Manager Jim Messina on why "clearly won tonight's debate":  
“That’s why I’m running for a second term as President—because we have more work to do.”—President Obama  If you're on #TeamBarack, pitch in $10 now to help win this thing:   
"Our fight goes on because we know this nation cannot succeed without a growing, thriving middle class."—President Obama  President Obama: "We are on pace to double our exports. That's creating tens of thousands of jobs all across the country." #TeamBarack 
President Obama: “We’ve made real progress these past four years. But Wisconsin, we all know our work’s not yet done.”  #RomneyExposed RT That exchange on Libya was Romney's Gerald Ford moment. He was lost and not presidential at all. 
President Obama: "Today, our businesses have created over 5 million new jobs. The American auto industry is back on top."  POTUS: "Romney was asked whether hiring more teachers was important to growing our economy. Gov. Romney said that doesn't grow our economy." 
President Obama: "In 2008, we were in the middle of two wars and the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression."  President Obama: "We have made sure that millions of young people are able to get an education when they weren't able to before." 
President Obama: “We’ve been inspired these past few days—because when disaster strikes, we see America at its best.”  "Gov Romney said he wasn’t referring to as Arizona a model for the nation. His top advisor's the one who designed the whole Arizona program" 
President Obama in Green Bay, WI: “I want to thank you for giving such a warm welcome to a Bears fan.”  President Obama on Romney: "He called the Arizona law a model for the nation." #SketchyDeal 
Happening now: President Obama speaks in Green Bay, Wisconsin.   POTUS on Romney: "His main strategy during the Republican primary was to say we’re going to encourage self-deportation." #SketchyDeal 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Green Bay, Wisconsin.   President Obama: "We need to fix a broken immigration system." 
5 days until this election’s over. Help win this thing—get out the vote this weekend:  #Forward2012  President Obama: "I said I would end the war in Iraq, and I did." #PromiseKept 
Make sure your friends and family know the choice on taxes in this election:    President Obama: "Four years ago, I told the American people I would cut taxes for middle-class people, and I did." 
"The President will win re-election if we do what we need to do."—@Messina2012 on the state of the race:   Mitt Romney: Believe in China.  #SketchyDeal 
Worth a RT: Obama is cutting our oil imports—Romney would make us more dependent on foreign oil.    Mitt Romney: Believe in China.  #SketchyDeal 
39 reasons to re-elect President Obama:  #Forward2012  FACT: Romney invested in a Chinese firm after learning it would “not be subject to taxes in the United States.”  
When you vote, "Please remember how quickly—but for the grace of God, luck, or genetics—this story could be yours."   On Romney: "He suggested that employers should be able to make the decision as to whether or not a woman gets contraception coverage." 
This election could come down to just a few thousand votes. Sign up today to help get out the vote:  #GOTV  Romney backs the Rubio-Blunt bill giving employers “moral” right to deny birth control coverage to women.  #SketchyDeal 
We’re less than a week away from Election Day. Vote early if you can—here’s a list of state-by-state deadlines:   "Gov. Romney feels comfortable having politicians in Washington decide the health care choices that women are making."—President Obama 
Thanks to Obamacare, insurance companies will no longer be able to charge women more than men for the same plan.   See how Mitt Romney and his allies would roll back women's rights in your state:  #SketchyDeal 
Share why you’re voting for President Obama:  #Forward2012  Mitt Romney refuses whether to say if he’d support the Lilly Ledbetter Fair Pay Act:  #SketchyDeal 
“I voted early for President Obama because I believe he will protect Social Security, Medicare, and Medicaid for the future.”—Peter A., CO  President Obama: "When Gov. Romney’s campaign was asked about the Lilly Ledbetter bill, they said they would get back to us." #SketchyDeal 
“President Obama and the Democratic Party have an agenda that is progressive and pro-growth.”—Raymond, CT  President Obama on equal pay: "This is not just a women's issue, this is a family issue—this is a middle-class issue." 
Shae, FL: “Why am I voting for President Obama? Simple. I believe in him, and that's coming from an ARMY VET!”  "When he’s asked how are you going to do it—which deductions, which loopholes are you going to close? [Romney] can’t tell you." #SketchyDeal 
Sam F., VA: “Because President Obama’s health care reform directly impacted my Type I diabetic brother's health.”  On Romney's deficit plan: "We haven’t heard from the governor any specifics beyond Big Bird & eliminating funding for Planned Parenthood." 
We asked folks why they’re voting for President Obama—here are some of their responses. #Forward2012  “I said I would cut taxes for small businesses, who are the drivers and engines of growth, and we’ve cut them 18 times.”—President Obama 
Make sure your friends know how Obamacare is making health insurance more affordable:    Romney’s tax plan would either raise middle-class taxes or explode the deficit—it’s one or the other:  #RealRomney 
Just 6 days left until Election Day. Help get out the vote in your community:  #Forward2012  President Obama: "I want to give middle-class families and folks who are striving to get into the middle class some relief." 
Election Day is just a week away. If you've already cast your ballot, let your friends know:    "Oil production is up, natural gas production is up, and most importantly, we’re also starting to build cars that are more efficient." 
“Every single day I set foot in the Oval Office, you know I’m thinking about you. I’m fighting for your families.”   New York Times’ Robert Semple: The U.S can’t just “drill its way to energy independence.”  #RealRomney 
Help Michelle get out the vote for the President—make calls to voters in key states:    Romney’s energy plan would do nothing for energy independence, and risks destroying thousands of jobs:  
Sign up now to help get out the vote before Election Day.    "Gov. Romney doesn't have a 5-point plan. He has a 1-point plan... to make sure that folks at the top play by a different set of rules." 
Colorado: Voting by mail? Put a stamp on that ballot and send it in today:   President Obama: “What I want to do is build on the 5 million jobs that we've created over the last 30 months in the private sector alone.” 
"I’ve raised my kids teaching them that it’s not enough to go vote on Election Day—you have to volunteer, too." —Loreen   President Obama: “The most important thing we can do is make sure that we’re creating jobs in this country. Not just jobs—good paying jobs.” 
Our thoughts and prayers go out to everyone affected by the storm. Support Red Cross relief efforts here:  -bo  The #RealRomney education plan? Shop around:  
Worth sharing with the women in your life:    Watch live: President Obama lays out his specific plan to keep growing the economy in tonight’s presidential debate.  
This election could come down to just a few thousand votes. Pick up a shift and head to a phone bank near you:   Follow tonight for live fact-checks and analysis of tonight's debate. #TeamObama2012 
Meet Walter: He’s 91, and he’s making calls for President Obama using the online call tool.   “Don’t be fooled”: Americans on the street react to #RealRomney:  
Chrysler has announced third-quarter profits up 80% from the same period last year:  #MadeInAmerica  #RealRomney: Remember what he’s said before.  
8 states in 48 hours: An inside look at President Obama’s two-day tour around the country last week.  #AmericaForward  Will Romney finally tell us how he’ll pay for his $5 trillion tax cut tonight?  #RealRomney 
Why are you voting for President Obama? Share your story:    Make sure your friends know: Romney supports overturning Roe v. Wade, which would take away a woman’s right to choose.  
This election’s too important to sit out. Find out when you can vote in your state:    The math behind Romney's tax plan is just a click away:  #MittMath 
President Obama: “For those of you who still need additional info about how to respond, you can go to   Mitt Romney's idea of bipartisan leadership: Ignore, insult, and oppose.  #RealRomney 
President Obama on Hurricane Sandy: "The great thing about America is that during tough times like this, we pull together."  FACT: Romney wants to take away a woman’s right to choose, but he told a newspaper last week that it’s not on his agenda. #TheRealRomney 
Watch live: President Obama speaks about Hurricane Sandy.   FACT: Romney insulted 47% of Americans at a private fundraiser—claiming they were “dependent” on government & consider themselves “victims.” 
Support storm relief efforts where they're needed most by contributing to the American Red Cross:   FACT: Romney claims he’d cover people with pre-existing conditions after repealing Obamacare, but even his own campaign said he wouldn't. 
If you live in Hurricane Sandy's path, get the information you need on how to prepare here:   FACT: After months of campaigning on his $5 trillion tax cut skewed to the wealthy, Romney is pretending it doesn’t exist. #TheRealRomney 
Only 8 days until Election Day. Time to step up and call voters in key states:   Will #TheRealRomney show up at tonight’s debate—or will it be the say-anything deal closer?  
Saying hi in New Hampshire:   President Clinton on Romney’s tax plan: “It hasn't worked before, and it won’t work this time.”  #MittMath 
Help President Obama win this in the final stretch: Make calls to voters in key states today.    Jay-Z wants you in a voting state of mind this fall:  #Forward2012 
.@IAmRashidaJones and talk through how you can help this campaign win using the #Obama2012 app:   Why Romney’s tax plan just doesn't add up:  #MittMath 
Spike had reservations about Obamacare—until it helped her get health insurance when she needed it most:  #ACA  New York Times: Romney "would move to take away a fundamental right that American women have had for nearly 40 years.”  
If you're on the Eastern seaboard, please make sure to follow the instructions of your state and local officials today. Stay safe. -bo  The Washington Post’s verdict on Romney's "new math" on jobs: four Pinocchios.  #MittMath 
We've got to move forward, not back:   President Clinton explains Romney’s false claims on taxes from the first debate vs. #TheRealRomney’s tax plan.  
States along the East Coast are preparing for Hurricane Sandy—support American Red Cross disaster relief efforts here:   Just 21 days until Election Day. RT if you’re ready to cheer on President Obama in tonight’s debate. #TeamObamaBiden 
The Portsmouth Herald (NH): “We trust President Obama to fight for the middle class.”   You look familiar:  
The Detroit Free Press highlights President Obama’s “stunning record of accomplishment” and endorses his re-election:   President Obama’s counting on you to vote:  #RegToVote 
Toledo Blade: "Ohioans will best serve their own interests, and those of the country, by re-electing President Obama."   Jay-Z has the President's back in this election. RT this video if you do, too:  
Think fast:  #Forward2012  If you've got the time, we've got the mission—travel to a battleground state to help finish this fight:  #Forward2012 
What we do in the next 9 days will shape the next 4 years and beyond. Leave it all out on the field—volunteer today:   President Obama has a specific plan to create more jobs and restore economic security for the middle class:  
Grabbing a pint with the President:   FACT: The unemployment rate is at its lowest level since January 2009, and consumer confidence is at a five-year high. 
“We've come too far and sacrificed too much to go back to an era of top-down, on-your-own economics.”  #Forward2012  FACT: Businesses have added 5.2 million new private-sector jobs over the past 31 straight months. #progress 
Welcoming the President to New Hampshire:   FACT: When President Obama took office, we were losing 800,000 jobs a month, but his policies have helped get the economy growing again. 
Can we list all the taxes and fees Gov. Romney raised on the Massachusetts middle class in 30 seconds?   Americans around the country are sticking with President Obama because he’s moving our economy forward:  
If this is what the President can do in 4 years, imagine what he can do in twice the time:   "Don't be fooled." People on the street compare Romney's recent claims to #TheRealRomney's positions:  
The President is putting higher education within reach for millions more Americans by doubling funding for Pell Grants.   Nonpartisan report: Seniors would pay more under Romney’s plan to turn Medicare into a voucher system.  
Obama: “We imagine a better America, and then we work hard to make it happen. That’s who we are. That’s why I’m asking for your vote.”  I'm following example and voting early, on October 25. If your state has early voting, join me:  -bo 
President Obama in NH: “It’s your choice. It’s up to the young people who are here to choose a future that’s worthy of all of your dreams.”  Today's one of your last chances to get an Obama car magnet before Election Day. Pitch in $10 now for yours:  
“We don’t need a whole bunch of politicians in Washington, most of whom are male, making health care decisions for women.”—President Obama  "Stick with this guy—he will move us forward." Americans on why they're with President Obama:  
Obama in NH: “The country has come too far to turn back now. We’ve got to continue with the policies that are getting us out of this mess.”  From beekeepers in Oregon to air traffic controllers in Montana, a snapshot of this campaign's 4,000,000 donors:  
On Romney as governor of MA: “When he left office, there were only 3 states in the country that had created fewer jobs than Massachusetts.”  4,000,000 people have donated to this campaign: that means about 1 in 75 Americans own a piece of it. (Thank you!)  
President Obama: “We know that our country is stronger when we can count on affordable health insurance and Medicare and Social Security.”  Only 22 days to go. Sign up to volunteer for the President over the final stretch of this campaign:  #Forward2012 
“10 days, New Hampshire. 10 days and you’ll be stepping into a voting booth and making a defining choice about the future of our country.”  Keep this campaign strong through the finish line—give $10 to Obama for America by texting GIVE to 62262.  6 msgs/mth. 
Watch live: President Obama speaks in New Hampshire about the choice in this election.   We knew this was coming:  
When you cast your vote, remember: Romney would bring back the failed top-down policies that crashed our economy.   It’s sweatshirt weather—this one goes well with a canvassing clipboard:  
Make sure your friends get the facts on how President Obama is fighting for women:    You never know who might show up at your local phone bank.   
10 days left to make sure we keep moving forward. Get out and volunteer this weekend:   Arlen Specter changed lives through years of service in the Senate with toughness, resolve, and fierce independence. He will be missed. -bo 
Pitch in $5 now and you’ll be automatically entered for the chance to join the President for Election Night in Chicago:   President Obama stands up for middle-class families. Stand up for him by getting involved at your local field office:  
Maya Angelou: “Every voice is equally powerful. Don't underestimate your vote. Voting is the great equalizer.”   FACT: Paul Ryan supported a plan to privatize Social Security—which would have put retirees' benefits at risk.  
Eric has a story that you need to hear:   Morgan Freeman: “Four years later, our enemies have been brought to justice. Our heroes are coming home."  #Forward2012 
President Obama’s second-term agenda will grow our economy from the middle out, not the top down:  #Forward2012  23 days left. Make 5 calls for President Obama today—your conversations could make a difference:  
FACT: The Washington Post fact-checker called Romney’s jobs claim a “bait-and-switch,” because the math “doesn’t add up.”  Mitt Romney paid a lower tax rate last year than many middle-class Americans—and he says that’s “fair”:  
FACT: Romney can't pay for his $5 trillion in tax cuts that favor the wealthy without raising middle-class taxes or exploding the deficit.  Take a look behind the scenes on the campaign trail on the road to Election Day:  #Forward2012 
Romney's promising “big change” today, but his plan would bring back the same failed policies that crashed our economy:   A powerful action takes a simple click—commit to vote:  
If you've already voted (like President Obama did yesterday), let everyone know it:    President Obama: “We refused to throw in the towel and do nothing. We refused to let Detroit go bankrupt.”  
If you missed the President's check-ins from the road on the #AmericaForward tour, you can watch them all here:   “The last thing we should do is turn back now.” A piece of advice from a familiar voice:  #Forward2012 
President Obama just spent 48 hours in 8 states sharing his plans to keep us moving forward. Help him spread the word:   Vince Carter, Alonzo Mourning, and other hoops stars share why they’re on #TeamObama—and why your vote is so important:  
Another great night in O-H-I-O:   Only 24 days ‘til Election Day. Help win this thing by volunteering in your community this weekend:  
The Road to November 6th—two weeks until Election Day edition:   Table for four: Kimberly, Mario, and Joe at #DinnerWithBarack in D.C. tonight.  
The secret's out: You can join the President in Chicago on Election Night (and have a front row ticket to history).   A photo that makes us smile:  
11 days left to win this thing. Help get out the vote for President Obama this weekend:  #Forward2012  If you’re on #TeamObamaBiden, now’s the time to show it. Pitch in $10 to help win this election:   
Welcome home, Mr. President: Wheels down, White House.   Last night, Paul Ryan hid the truth about how the Romney-Ryan budget would hurt the middle class. Get the facts:  
President Obama’s sign-off after 8 states in 48 hours: “Don’t quit. Let’s make sure we run through the tape.”   FACT: Romney and Ryan don't have a plan for our troops in Afghanistan. The President has a clear plan to end the war in 2014. #DetailsMatter 
I spy ... the President of the United States of America.   FACT: Romney and Ryan support overturning Roe v. Wade, which would take away a woman’s right to make her own health decisions. 
President Obama in Cleveland: “We’ve come too far to turn back now.”   FACT: Romney-Ryan would pay for their $5 trillion tax cut favoring the wealthy by raising middle-class taxes or by exploding the deficit. 
President Obama: "I'm honored to be the first sitting president who has ever early voted."   FACT: Ryan couldn’t explain how Romney’s plan to double down on trickle-down would create jobs, because it wouldn’t. #DetailsMatter 
Thank you, OH, IL, VA, FL, CA, NV, CO, and IA. These last 48 hours have me feeling ready to go for the next 11 days. Are you with me? -bo  Paul Ryan spent last night’s debate making empty promises and repeating widely debunked attacks:  
If you missed Air Force One rolling up to President Obama's final tour stop in Cleveland, it was pretty epic:   In these last 25 days, it's good to know we've got each other's backs. What do you say?   
“If you give me your vote, I promise you will continue to have a president who hears your voices. A president who fights for your families.”  FACT: #TeamObamaBiden kept their promise to end the Iraq war. Romney & Ryan would have left troops there indefinitely:  
President Obama: "Ohio, I believe in you, and I need you to keep believing in me." #AmericaForward  Wolf Blitzer: “Congressman Ryan’s low point happened near the end of the debate … when he was asked about abortion.”  
"Our destiny is not written for us, it's written by us. And we can write that next chapter together." —President Obama  Mark Shields: “He really kind of hung Ryan out to dry on the no details of the tax plan. ... That really was exposed.”  
"We don't look backwards, we look forward." —President Obama  Chuck Todd: “If you were scoring as a debate coach, you’d say, ‘Boy, the guy who controlled that debate was Joe Biden.”  
"You can make it here in America if you try. That's who we are. That's who we're fighting for." #AmericaForward  Paul Ryan's playbook last night: Double-down on falsehoods, hide the details, stay silent on women's rights.  
"We all have a place in America if you're willing to work hard, if you're willing to stand up."—President Obama  The reviews of the #VPDebate are in—here's what people across the political spectrum are saying about Biden's win:  
President Obama: "We can choose the policies that give us the prospect of broad-based prosperity." #AmericaForward  If you're proud of Vice President Biden for winning last night's debate, let him know:  #TeamObamaBiden 
President Obama: "It's up to the young people who are here to choose the future that you want." #AmericaForward  Just 25 days until Election Day. Get out there and volunteer this weekend:  
President Obama: "It's now up to you to choose the path that we take." #AmericaForward  President Obama watching tonight's vice presidential debate:  
Obama: “I wasn't going to let Detroit go bankrupt. Or Toledo go bankrupt. Or Lordstown go bankrupt. I bet on American workers.”  What they're saying about the vice presidential debate:  #TeamJoe 
“If Romney had been president when the American auto industry was on the verge of collapse, we might not have an American auto industry.”  If you’re on #TeamJoe, now’s the time to show it. Pitch in $5 or more to help win this election:  
"Whatever the symptoms are, don't worry—Obamacare covers pre-existing conditions."—President Obama on Romnesia  Tonight proved once again that you won't find a better and more tireless advocate for the middle class than -bo #TeamJoe 
"In the closing moments of the election, Gov. Romney's hoping you too will come down with a severe case of Romnesia." —President Obama  Political Wire: "Biden was more prepared, more experienced and the clear winner":  #TeamJoe 
Obama on Romney: “He’s hoping that you come down with a case of what we call…” Crowd: “Romnesia!”  VP Biden: “The two budgets the congressman introduced have eviscerated all that the middle class cares about.” #DetailsMatter 
President Obama: “I've come to Ohio today to ask you for your vote. I need your vote, and I need your help to move this country forward.”  VP Biden: "My whole life has been dedicated to leveling the playing field for working-class people." 
"Even though I've been going for 38 hours straight ... I've still got a spring in my step because our cause is right." #AmericaForward  The ten things you should know about the Romney-Ryan view of women’s health and women’s rights:  #DetailsMatter 
Obama: "We just made a quick stop in Chicago so I could vote." #GottaVote  Paul Ryan called for overturning Roe v. Wade. #DetailsMatter 
President Obama: "We've been from the east coast to the west coast, and now we're going back east again." #AmericaForward  Rep. Ryan has cast 60 anti-choice votes during his time in Congress.  #DetailsMatter 
President Obama: “Hello, Ohio! Are you fired up? Are you ready to go?” #AmericaForward  "We only have one truly sacred obligation as a government, & that’s to equip those we send into harm’s way & care for those who come home." 
Watch President Obama speak live from Cleveland, the last stop on the #AmericaForward tour:   VP Biden: “I do not believe that we have a right to tell other people, women, that they can’t control their bodies.” 
Election-year flair on display in Cleveland:   Joe Biden: "If you notice, he never answers the question." #DetailsMatter 
From President Obama, three things:   VP Biden on Afghanistan: "We are leaving in 2014. Period." 
Cleveland: Crowd, tarmac, setting sun.   Why Romney and Ryan's tax plan does not pass the arithmetic test:  #FactsMatter 
#AmericaForward high-five count: 3.   FACT: President Obama proposed extending middle class tax cuts for 98% of families. 
Rosemary's fired up to see the President in Cleveland, OH:   Obamacare increases Medicare’s solvency 8 years longer than without health care reform. #FactsMatter 
The crowd gathers at President Obama's next and final stop: Cleveland, Ohio.   FACT: President Obama is committed to protecting and strengthening Social Security and opposes any attempts to privatize it. 
Smile if you've voted early. If you haven’t, find out when you can vote in your state:    VP Biden: "We will be no part of a voucher program or the privatization of Social Security." 
“Hey, this is Barack!” President Obama makes calls with volunteers in Chicago:   Ryan voted for the policies that crashed the economy. #FactsMatter 
Thank you for everything you're doing to make this campaign run. Let's keep going:   VP Biden on Paul Ryan: “He sent me 2 letters saying, ‘By the way, can you send me some stimulus money for companies here in WI?’” 
Since the beginning of this campaign in April 2011, a total of 4,200,000 people have pitched in to own a piece of it.  .@JoeBiden: "The people I grew up with and my neighbors—they pay more effective tax than Gov. Romney pays on his federal income tax." 
Every five bucks helped: More than 98% of contributions were $250 or less, with an average contribution of $46.92.  VP Biden: "War should always be the absolute last resort." 
Of the 1.2 million people who donated, 207,264 people hadn't supported this campaign before.  "Facts matter." —Joe Biden #WrongAgainRyan 
In the first 17 days of October, 1,251,291 people came together to raise $90,500,000 for the campaign and combined committees.  VP Biden on Iran: "These are the most crippling sanctions in the history of sanctions. Period." 
We're filing our last pre-election FEC report tomorrow, and here's a preview.  Watch live: lays out the Obama-Biden plan to keep us moving forward.  #ReadyForJoe 
President Obama just became the first sitting president to vote early:    Be sure to follow during tonight’s VP debate for live fact-checks and analysis. #RyansChoice 
This afternoon, President Obama will become the first sitting president to vote early. Find out if you can join him:   Will Paul Ryan explain the math behind his plan to cut taxes for the wealthy, or deny the plan exists? #RyansChoice 
President Obama: “Rape is rape. It is a crime.”   Will stand by Romney and Ryan's extreme anti-choice agenda, or pretend it doesn't exist? #RyansChoice 
FACT: Romney would take away a woman’s right to choose and even said he’d be “delighted” to sign a bill banning all abortions.  Casual fibs, flat-out falsehoods: What other misleading gambits will Paul Ryan pull out at tonight’s debate?  
FACT: Rep. Steve King, who Romney called a “partner in Washington,” said he’s never heard of anyone getting pregnant from statutory rape.  Only one candidate in this race is standing up for women's health, and that's President Obama:   
FACT: Romney’s running mate Paul Ryan referred to rape as a “method of conception” and co-sponsored a bill to redefine rape with Todd Akin.  Forward, Florida:  
Romney’s endorsement of Mourdock is just the latest example of the severely conservative candidates he supports.  Mitt Romney isn't telling voters the truth about his plans for this country:   
Many GOP leaders are cutting ties with Richard Mourdock for his outrageous rape comments—but Romney still supports him:   Paul Ryan stars in “The 7 Habits of Highly Misleading People.”  
Watch President Obama fire up the crowd in Richmond, VA:  #AmericaForward  If you're on #TeamObamaBiden, RT so your friends know the best place to watch tonight’s debate:   
Find out if you can vote early in your state:   POTUS: “You can agree to turn back the clock 50 years for women, immigrants, gays, and lesbians—or you can decide to keep moving forward.” 
The President checks in from Richmond, on his way to Chicago to vote early:   POTUS: “You are the reason that Florida seniors are saving an average of $600 a year on prescription drugs, because we passed Obamacare.” 
What a great view, Virginia! My voice might be getting hoarse, but the energy out here is going strong. -bo  “We understand that America’s not about what can be done for us. It’s about what can be done by us, as one nation, one people.” 
Forward, Virginia:   “I think bringing our troops home to their families was the right thing to do.”—President Obama 
How big was the crowd in Richmond? This big:  #AmericaForward  President Obama on Romney: “He said it was ‘tragic’ to end the war in Iraq. He said we should have left troops on the ground in Iraq.” 
“Our destiny is not written for us, it’s written by us. And we’re going to write the next chapter together.”   President Obama on Romney: “His plan will not create jobs. It will not help the middle class. It will not speed up the recovery.” 
Obama: “It’s up to the young people out there to decide what kind of future you want for yourselves.” #AmericaForward  President Obama on Mitt Romney: “When he’s asked about the cost of his new tax plan, he just pretends it doesn't exist.” 
Obama: “I don’t think any male politician should be making health care decisions for women.”  "After more than a year in which he said he was 'severely conservative,' Romney’s trying to convince you that he was severely kidding.” 
President Obama: “I believe women are capable and should make their own health care decisions for themselves.”  President Obama: “We reinvented a dying auto industry that’s come roaring back to the top of the world.” #MadeInAmerica 
President Obama: “Finally, I’ll use the savings from ending the wars in Afghanistan and Iraq to do some nation-building here at home.”  President Obama: “We repealed ‘Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,’ so no one’s ever kicked out of the military because of who they love.” 
President Obama: “Number 4: My plan will cut the deficit by $4 trillion in 10 years.” #AmericaForward  President Obama: “I promised to cut taxes for small business owners and we have, 18 times.” 
President Obama: “Number 3: I want to make it a national mission to educate our young people, to train our workers.”  "We passed health care reform—aka Obamacare—so insurance companies can't jerk you around anymore."—President Obama 
Obama: “Number 2: I want to cut our oil imports in half by 2020 so we control more of our own energy.”  President Obama: "Four years ago, I told you I'd end the war in Iraq, and we did." 
President Obama: “The first thing in my plan: I want to end tax breaks for companies that ship jobs overseas.”  POTUS: “Everything we fought for in 2008 is on the line in 2012. I’m going to need you fired up. I’m going to need you ready to go.” 
“I've got a plan that will actually create jobs, not just talk about creating jobs. A plan that will actually create middle-class security.”  Watch live: President Obama speaks in Florida about what’s at stake in this election.  
President Obama: “Trust matters. You want to know that whoever’s in the Oval Office is going to fight for you.”  Romney claims “people don’t die” because they lack health insurance. Watch Ryan’s story to see why that’s not true:  
President Obama: "I've come to ask for your help in keeping America moving forward."  President Obama’s plan would give tax breaks to companies who invest in America, not ones that ship jobs overseas:  
On voting early today: “I can’t tell you who I’m voting for because it’s a secret ballot. The good news is, Michelle said she voted for me.”  “Love you back.”  
President Obama in VA: “My voice sounds just a little hoarse. We are right in the middle of our 8-state, fly-around campaign extravaganza.”  Only 26 days until Election Day. Tune in here tonight at 9pm ET to cheer on in the vice presidential debate:  
Watch live: President Obama speaks in Virginia about the stark choice we face in this election.  #AmericaForward  Give me four for four more years:  
Crowds literally as far as the eye can see, waiting for President Obama in Richmond, VA:   Spread the word: President Obama is strengthening Medicaid, while Mitt Romney’s budget would cut it by one-third.  
Four more for number 44:   Join and for an inside look at the campaign's ground game. Starting now:  #DashboardLive 
President Obama last night on Richard Mourdock: “I don’t know how these guys come up with these ideas. Rape is rape.”   Mitt Romney will say anything to win this election:  #TheRealRomney 
The President talks to about the debates, voting early, and his take on the GOP's policies for women:   Spencer, a supporter in Michigan: "We need him to take us forward ... but we've got to help him get there."  
Five states down—now off to Virginia. Get the latest from the ground here:    FACT: #TheRealRomney’s plan would deny health care coverage to millions of Americans with pre-existing conditions. 
So long, Florida:   FACT: #TheRealRomney’s plan would turn Medicare into a voucher system, increasing out-of-pocket costs for retirees by $6,000 a year. 
President Obama explained his plans for a second term in Tampa this morning. Take a look:    FACT: #TheRealRomney has been promising a $5 trillion tax cut that would mean raising taxes on the middle class. 
12 days left in the President’s final campaign. Make sure each one counts—get out and volunteer to help win this thing:   FACT: #TheRealRomney has said he wants to see Roe v. Wade overturned, denying women the right to choose. 
Colin Powell endorsed President Obama this morning, citing his leadership on jobs, foreign policy, and health care:   Mitt Romney isn't being honest with the American people about his extreme positions:  
President Obama welcomes you to day two of his 8-state, 48-hour "campaign extravaganza":   Be a part of tonight’s #DashboardLive messaging strategy session. It starts at 8:30pm ET, and you can RSVP here:  
Babies for Obama:   We’re facing tough choices on what the final push of this grassroots organization will look like. Pitch in $10 to help:  
Obama: "Women should be making their own health care decisions. That’s why the health care law we passed put those choices in your hands."  President Clinton: The real Mitt Romney will say anything to win.  #TheRealRomney 
"I don’t think any politician in Washington, most of whom are male, should be making health care decisions for women."   “You’re no victim. You earned your benefits. Don’t let Mitt Romney take them away.”  
President Obama: “Trust matters, and Florida, you know me. You know I say what I mean, and I mean what I say.” #AmericaForward  Stand with the only candidate in this election who’s fighting to make college more affordable:   
The sun's fully up as the President takes the stage in Tampa.   Just 27 days left in this campaign. Pitch in $5 or more now to help win this thing in the final stretch:  #Forward2012 
A bit of morning shootaround at the firehouse before the day's first event in Tampa:   GM just announced it's adding 2,000 jobs, many to staff a new IT innovation center in Warren, Michigan:  #MadeInAmerica 
"Thank you for everything you guys do."   Election Day is just 4 weeks away. Pitch in $20—that’s only $5 each week—to help win this election:  
Palm trees, Tampa crowd await President Obama.   Romney sees millions of Americans with Medicare as “victims.” His plan would turn Medicare into a voucher system:  
After last night's Vegas event, the President took a minute to share his thoughts on day one of his 48-hour trip:   Download, print, put it in the mail: Your three easy steps to register to vote today.  #RegToVote 
Beat the sun to Tampa. Looking forward to day two of our marathon trip. -bo  President Obama: "Let's go vote. Let's go win this election."  
This morning: Tampa. President Obama just stopped by a local firehouse, and brought breakfast.   "I’m not fighting to create Democratic jobs or Republican jobs. I’m fighting to create American jobs."—President Obama 
Four states down, four states to go in the President's 48-hour #AmericaForward tour: today he hits FL, VA, IL, and OH.   President Obama: "We understand that America's not what can be done for us, it's about what can be done by us—as one nation, as one people." 
Leaving Las Vegas—on to Tampa (and day two of this 8-state trip).   "Gov. Romney said it was 'tragic' to end the war in Iraq. I disagree. I think it was the right thing to do."—President Obama 
The President winds up sticking around, gives amazing speech about hard work. Casino staff start spontaneous chant of "four more years."  POTUS: "We can gut education to pay for Gov. Romney’s tax cuts, or we can do what I propose—recruit 100,000 math and science teachers." 
Amazing/surreal moment in Vegas: POTUS stops to talk to casino workers. Means to just shake a few hands, but word gets out...  "Climate change is not a hoax. More droughts and wildfires are not a joke. They're a threat to your future."—President Obama 
Casino staffers in Las Vegas greeting the President:   President Obama: "Today, the United States is less dependent on foreign oil than at any time in the last two decades." 
President Obama on pulling an all-nighter on this trip: If you're not going to sleep, "you might as well be in Vegas." #AmericaForward  President Obama: "I believe we can create more jobs by controlling more of our own energy." 
In Las Vegas, last stop of the day: vote early.    President Obama: "A strong economy doesn’t trickle down from the top—it comes from a thriving middle class." 
Good night, L.A.   President Obama: "The last thing we can afford to do now is to go back to the same policies that got us into this mess in the first place." 
President Obama with & co:   "Manufacturing is coming back to America. Home values are back on the rise. We have come too far to turn back now."—President Obama 
Just two guys hanging out backstage:   President Obama: "We repealed 'Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell,' as I promised we would." 
President Obama just finished taping an appearance on sure to tune in tonight!  "We passed health care reform, also known as Obamacare, because I do care. I don’t want insurance companies jerking you around anymore." 
President Obama’s voting early tomorrow. Find out if you can, too:  #GottaVote  President Obama: "I promised to end the war in Iraq, and we did." 
A note from the President, 12 hours into the #AmericaForward tour:   President Obama: "I need you fired up, I need you ready to go vote. Because we've got some work to do. We've got an election to win." 
Chasing the sun to L.A.   "I've got a question for you, Buckeyes. Are you registered to vote? Because if you're not, today is the last day you can get registered." 
FACT: Romney is Richard Mourdock’s most prominent supporter, and the star of his latest campaign ad:   President Obama: "Hello, Buckeyes! O-H..." Audience: "I-O!" 
Romney refuses to withdraw support for Richard Mourdock—who claims pregnancies from rape are "something God intended."   We’ll be live-tweeting the President’s speech on along for the latest. 
Two states down; six to go. Next stop: L.A. to tape the Tonight Show with Jay Leno.   Watch live: President Obama speaks in Ohio about the stark choice we face in this election.  
Watch the speech that got Coloradans fired up for President Obama:  #AmericaForward  You can register to vote in less than 5 minutes. Get it done right here before it’s too late --->  #RegToVote 
"I voted early in person today because he's the President I want for four more years & for my daughter." —Fred in CO   Worth a RT: Today’s the last day to register to vote in several states. Fill out your form here—then mail it in.  
Tiffany from Colorado: “Everybody needs go out and vote for President Obama today.”   For many families, Medicaid is the only way to afford care for the elderly—but Romney’s budget would cut it by a third:  
Denver, that was really something—and your "four more years" chant was one of the best I've heard. -bo  Today’s the deadline to register to vote in several states. Take a minute to fill out your form—then mail it in today:  
Grey skies but all smiles:   28 days 'til Election Day, but today's the voter registration deadline in many states. Fill out your form & mail it in:  
